NUMBER  PORTABILITY 

S.  HRG.  110–1163 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  12,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–680 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 12, 2007 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

tion 

Banks, Jonathan, Senior Vice President, Law and Policy, USTelecom Associa-
........................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Clark,  Hon.  Tony,  Commissioner,  North  Dakota  Public  Service  Commission 
Chairman,  Telecommunications  Committee,  National  Association  of  Regu-
latory Utility Commissioners (NARUC)  .............................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Guttman-McCabe,  Christopher,  Vice  President,  Regulatory  Affairs,  CTIA— 
The Wireless Association®  ...................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schremp, Ted, Senior Vice President and General Manager, Telephone, Char-
....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

ter Communications, Inc. 

Page 
1 
21 
21 
25 
1 
30 

8 
10 

15 
17 

11 
13 

2 
4 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

NUMBER  PORTABILITY 

THURSDAY,  JULY  12,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:06  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS [presiding]. Good morning. 
Senator Inouye is stuck in traffic, and asked us to start the hear-

ing. 

Let  me  say  that  advances  and  innovations  in  communications 
technologies  are  changing  the  communications  marketplace.  These 
changes  are  very  good  for  consumers.  One  of  the  changes  is  in-
creased  competition  for  voice  services.  Ten  years  ago,  when  Con-
gress  passed  the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996,  almost  all  con-
sumers  had  was  telecommunications  from  their  local  telephone 
company. 

Today, consumers have many choices for voice services, from tele-
phone  companies,  cable  companies,  wireless  companies,  and  Inter-
net-voice  service  companies.  But,  consumers  are  less  likely  to  take 
advantage of the new choices if they cannot keep their phone num-
bers. 

One  problem  is  delay.  We’ve  heard  instances  from  a  number  of 
ports  taking  10  to  30  days.  And  we  have  heard  some  providers  re-
quiring  more  than  100  pieces  of  data  to  port  a  number.  These  are 
unnecessary hassles that consumers complain about, and that pro-
viders are slow to correct. 

Another  problem  is  that  not  all  types  of  providers  are  covered 
under the FCC rules. When the FCC first promulgated its number 
portability rules, there were far fewer choices. It’s time for the FCC 
to revisit those rules, and expand them to today’s new voice service 
market.  Consumers  should  not  be  limited  in  their  choices,  because 
they  cannot  risk  losing  key  contacts  or  businesses  as  a  result  of 
having to change their phone numbers. 

Senator  Inouye  and  I  have  introduced  the  Same  Number  Act  of 
2007,  to  help  consumers.  And  the  bill  requires  the  FCC  to  revisit 
its  number  portability  rules,  and  extend  them  to  all  applicable 
voice communications services, not just telecommunications service. 
It  does  not  advantage  any  one  industry  sector,  instead  it  requires 
all services to port numbers on a reciprocal basis. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

2 

It  also  calls  for  a  notice  to  consumers,  so  that  consumers  will 

know what to expect when they change their services. 

We  look  forward  to  hearing  today  from  the  panel,  and  we’ll  try 
to  find  out  how  we  can  shape  this  bill  to  help  consumers  take  ad-
vantage  of  new  choices,  and  lower  prices,  available  in  today’s  com-
munications marketplace. 

Our witnesses this morning, Mr. Ted Schremp, Senior Vice Presi-
dent  and  General  Manager  of  Charter  Telephone.  Mr.  Jonathon 
Banks, Senior Vice President for Law and Policy, U.S. Telecom As-
sociation,  Mr.  Chris  Guttman-McCabe,  Vice  President  for  Regu-
latory  Affairs  at  CTIA,  and  Mr.  Tony  Clark,  Commissioner  of  the 
North  Dakota  Public  Service  Commission,  and  Chairman  of  the 
Telecommunications Committee of the National Association of Reg-
ulatory Utility Commissioners. 

I’m  delighted  that  you  gentlemen  would  join  us,  and  Senator 
Inouye  will  be  along,  so  I  would  appreciate  it  if  you  would  start 
your  statement,  and  keep  them  short,  if  you  can.  We’ll  print  your 
full statements in the record, but we’ll be pleased to listen to what-
ever you have to testify. 

Mr. Schremp, will you start, please? 

STATEMENT OF TED SCHREMP, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT 

AND GENERAL MANAGER, TELEPHONE, 

CHARTER COMMUNICATIONS, INC. 

Mr. SCHREMP. Certainly. Good morning, Vice Chairman Stevens, 
and  my  name  is  Ted  Schremp,  and  I’m  Senior  Vice  President  and 
General  Manager  of  Telephone  at  Charter  Communications.  From 
the  company’s  headquarters  in  St.  Louis,  Missouri,  I  direct  and 
oversee  all  operational  and  business  matters  concerning  Charter’s 
provision of residential and commercial voice services. 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you to testify on 
an issue of real importance to millions of consumers and businesses 
across the United States. And one which is essential to the contin-
ued viability of competition in the local voice services market. 

Charter  believes  that  clear  and  consistent—as  well  as  im-
proved—number  porting  policies  are  essential  to  ensuring  greater 
competition among providers of local voice services, and we greatly 
appreciate  the  Committee’s  efforts  to  review  these  issues  in  this 
hearing, and its ongoing efforts to enhance competition in the mar-
ketplace. 

Charter  is  a  broadband  communications  company,  with  over 
16,000  employees,  and  approximately  5.7  million  customers  in  29 
states.  Our  broadband  network  passes  11.7  million  homes,  which 
we offer a full range of advanced broadband services, including dig-
ital  cable  programming,  broadband  Internet  access,  advanced 
broadband cable services, and telephone service. 

Charter  telephone  is  delivered,  primarily,  using  an  Internet  pro-
tocol-enabled  platform,  run  over  the  cable  company’s  privately 
managed hybrid fiber coax network. We serve nearly 600,000 phone 
customers,  primarily  residential  phone  customers,  in  18  states,  in-
cluding 9 of the states before this Committee, and we will continue 
to  roll  out  our  competitive  voice  service  in  additional  markets  this 
year and next. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

3 

Our customers are different than those of most of the major cable 
operators, but as Senators on this Committee, you know them well. 
They’re  predominantly  located  in  less  densely  populated  regions  of 
the  country,  including  many  that  would  be  defined  as  suburban, 
exurban,  and  rural  areas,  for  example,  Worcester,  Massachusetts; 
Kennewick,  Washington;  St.  Cloud  and  Mankato,  Minnesota; 
Greenville/Spartanburg; South Carolina; and Slidell, Louisiana. 

Because many of these markets are in less densely populated re-
gions,  Charter  is  often  the  only  competitive  alternative.  Charter 
also  offers  service,  of  course,  in  Eastern  Missouri,  including  the 
Greater St. Louis area, which is the location of our corporate head-
quarters. 

Because  we’re  aggressively  deploying  our  voice  communication 
service,  we  rely  heavily  on  the  number  porting  process  to  compete 
with  the  incumbent  providers.  In  fact,  on  a  weekly  basis,  Charter 
engages  in  approximately  13,000  porting  transactions.  Unfortu-
nately,  in  the  course  of  these  porting  transactions,  Charter  experi-
ences a fallout rate of approximately 15 percent, translating to over 
150  rejected  orders  every  day.  As  such,  Charter  is  acutely  aware 
of  the  value  of  efficient  and  effective  porting  procedures,  and  the 
very  real  costs  incurred  when  porting  procedures  are  undermined, 
or disregarded by other providers. 

In  addition,  when  ports  take  an  unreasonably  long  time  to  com-
plete, it’s extremely difficult for Charter to compete in those carrier 
service territories, because a subscriber wishing to move to Charter 
service must sometimes wait for as long as 2 weeks before they can 
switch  providers,  causing  many  subscribers  simply  to  decline  to 
continue  the  process  and  instead  remain  with  the  incumbent  pro-
vider. 

Charter  believes  the  implementation  of  additional  porting  prin-
ciples  would  further  enhance  the  competitive  landscape,  and  ulti-
mately  benefit  consumers.  We’re  confident  that  these  principles— 
if  implemented—would  further  Congress’s  goal  of  reducing  bar-
riers,  and  accelerating  competitive  entry  to  the  voice  marketplace. 
First,  incumbent  telephone  companies  often  require  requesting 
providers—including  Charter—to  complete  complicated  service 
order forms that require numerous data points, many having little, 
if  anything,  to  do  with  the  processes  necessary  to  port  a  telephone 
number.  As  a  result,  Charter  believes  that  the  port  requests  must 
be  validated  and  completed  after  the  competitive  provider  supplies 
the  minimum  necessary  information  to  complete  the  port—gen-
erally, the name, address, and telephone number of the subscriber. 
In  addition,  although  the  FCC  has  established  that  all  wireline 
providers  must  complete  port  requests  within  four  business  days, 
many providers do not. Many providers take well over 4 days to re-
turn a firm order commitment, resulting in a timeline of anywhere 
between 5 and 12 business days to complete a port request. There-
fore, another important principle that could benefit competitors and 
consumers  alike,  is  that  all  wireline  carriers  must  complete 
wireline-to-wireline ports within four business days, or less. 

Second,  there  are  some  instances  when  a  port  request  is  sched-
uled to occur, but for one reason or another, the request cannot be 
completed,  because  of  an  operational  issue,  or  an  issue  related  to 
the  customer.  When  a  port  request  cannot  be  completed  before  5 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

4 

p.m.  on  the  day  of  the  scheduled  port,  some  incumbent  providers 
will simply terminate service to the subscriber, rather than wait for 
the  port  to  be  completed  successfully  at  a  later  time,  resulting  in 
the  customer’s  dial  tone  being  interrupted  for  one  or  more  days. 
Thus,  all  providers  should  adopt  a  policy  of  not  terminating  num-
bers from their switch for at least 48 hours after the scheduled port 
request  is  completed,  to  ensure  that  customers  do  not  lose  service, 
access  to  911,  or  access  to  their  telephone  number,  in  the  event 
that a port cannot be completed on the scheduled date. 

Finally, in addition to the practices described above, several car-
riers continue to attempt to impose carrier-to-carrier charges, fees, 
or add-ons to such charges for completing customer requests to port 
a  number  from  the  carrier’s  network  to  Charter’s  network.  Al-
though  the  FCC  has  repeatedly  ruled  that  carriers  must  cover  the 
cost  of  a  number,  of  number  portability  via  tariffed  end-user 
charges,  several  incumbent  carriers  continue  to  ignore  those  rules, 
and act in blatant disregard of the FCC’s directive. Some providers 
attempt  to  mask  these  charges,  claiming  that  they’re  associated 
with the recovery of administrative costs related to porting. 

Accordingly,  another  principle  essential  to  continuing  the  com-
petitive  benefits  of  efficient  number  porting,  is  the  notion  that  in-
cumbent  LECs  may  not  recover  any  costs  associated  with  porting, 
via  any  charge,  fee  or  add-ons  to  interconnection  charges  to  other 
providers. 

In  conclusion,  implementation  of  these  principles  would  further 
the establishment of fair and efficient number porting processes for 
competitive  providers,  resulting  in  increased  consumer  choice,  and 
competitive voice alternatives. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before 
you  today,  I’ll  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you  or  the  other 
Committee members may have. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Schremp follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TED SCHREMP, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT AND GENERAL 

MANAGER, TELEPHONE, CHARTER COMMUNICATIONS, INC. 

Introduction 

Good  morning,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  members  of  the 
Committee.  My  name  is  Ted  Schremp  and  I  am  Senior  Vice  President  and  General 
Manager of Telephone at Charter Communications, Inc. (‘‘Charter’’). From the com-
pany’s headquarters in St. Louis, Missouri, I direct and oversee all operational and 
business matters concerning Charter’s provision of residential and commercial voice 
services. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  to  testify  on  an  issue  of  real 
importance  to  millions  of  consumers  and  businesses  across  the  United  States,  and 
one which is central to the continued viability of competition in the local voice serv-
ices  market.  As  explained  in  greater  detail  below,  Charter  believes  that  clear  and 
consistent,  as  well  as  improved,  number  porting  policies  are  essential  to  ensuring 
greater competition among providers of local voice services. For that reason, Charter 
greatly  appreciates  the  Committee’s  efforts  to  review  these  issues  in  this  hearing, 
and its ongoing efforts to enhance competition in the marketplace. 
Background on Charter and Its Voice Service Offerings 

Charter  is  a  broadband  communications  company  with  over  sixteen  thousand 
(16,000)  employees  and  approximately  5.7  million  customers  in  twenty-nine  (29) 
states.  Our  broadband  network  passes  11.7  million  homes,  to  which  we  offer  a  full 
range  of  advanced  broadband  services,  including  digital  cable  programming, 
broadband  Internet  access,  advanced  broadband  cable  services  and  telephone  serv-
ice. Charter Telephone® is delivered via Charter’s subsidiary, Charter Fiberlink, pri-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

5 

marily utilizing an Internet Protocol-enabled platform run over the cable company’s 
privately managed hybrid fiber coax network. 

As  of  our  last  public  filing,  Charter  Telephone® served  nearly  six  hundred  thou-
sand  (600,000)  primarily  residential  customers  in  eighteen  (18)  states,  including 
nine (9) before this committee: California, Massachusetts, Minnesota, Missouri, Ne-
vada, South Carolina, Oregon, Texas, and Washington. Charter will continue to roll 
out  our  competitive  voice  service  in  additional  markets  this  year.  Expanding  the 
reach and scope of our voice offerings throughout our service area is one of our high-
est  priorities,  and  we  have  invested  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  to  date.  As  a 
result,  Charter  Telephone® is  currently  available  to  over  7.3  million  homes  within 
our  service  territory,  and  we  expect  that  number  to  continue  to  increase  over  the 
next 18 months. 

Our customers are different than those of most of the other major cable operators, 
but  as  Senators  on  this  Committee,  you  know  them  well.  They  are  predominantly 
located  in  less  densely  populated  regions  of  the  country,  including  many  suburban, 
exurban,  and  rural  areas.  Accordingly,  many  of  the  largest  markets  for  Charter’s 
voice  services  are  what  some  people  in  the  industry  classify  as  ‘‘Tier  II’’  and  ‘‘Tier 
III’’  markets,  for  example:  Worcester  Massachusetts,  Kennewick  Washington,  St. 
Cloud  and  Mankato  Minnesota,  Greenville/Spartanburg  South  Carolina,  and  Slidell 
Louisiana. Charter also offers service in eastern Missouri, including the greater St. 
Louis metropolitan area, the location of our corporate headquarters. 

In  these  markets,  we  are  aggressively  rolling  out  voice  services  in  competition 
with  the  incumbent  local  exchange  carriers;  often  providing  the  first  real  facilities- 
based competitive alternative to many residential consumers. And, because many of 
these markets are in less densely populated regions, Charter is often the only com-
petitive alternative. 

Across  all  of  our  markets,  the  response  to  our  offerings  has  been  very  positive, 
as  consumers  are  attracted  to  Charter  by  the  innovative  product  offering,  cost  sav-
ings,  and  the  convenience  of  obtaining  all  of  their  communications  services  from  a 
single  provider.  Our  research  indicates  that  we  save  the  average  consumer  20  per-
cent or more on their monthly telephone bill. New customers can sign up for Char-
ter’s  unlimited  nationwide  service  for  as  low  as  $29.99  per  month,  which  provides 
substantial  savings  to  our  customers  as  compared  to  most  traditional  telephone 
service  providers.  In  addition,  Charter  provides  meaningful  value  added  services 
such as call waiting, caller ID, call forwarding, etc. And, of course, Charter’s service 
has  always  provided  full  E–911  calling  functionality.  The  savings  and  value  of  our 
service  can  be  further  enhanced  by  bundling  with  Charter’s  digital  cable  and 
broadband Internet services, for as low as $99.97 per month. 

Because Charter is aggressively deploying its voice communications service to tens 
of  thousands  of  potential  new  customers  in  new  markets  it  relies  heavily  on  the 
number porting process to compete with the incumbent providers in those markets. 
In  fact,  Charter  engages  in  approximately  thirteen  thousand  (13,000)  number 
porting transactions every week. Unfortunately, in the course of those porting trans-
actions Charter experiences a fall out rate of over fifteen percent (15 percent). This 
rate  translates  to  over  150  rejected  orders  every  day  where  the  customer  is  at  risk 
of losing dial tone when a port cannot be canceled or rescheduled as a result of lack 
of carrier cooperation. As such, Charter is acutely aware of the value of efficient and 
effective  porting  procedures,  and  the  very  real  costs  incurred  (including  operational 
costs,  loss  of  revenue,  and  particularly  customer  frustration  and  dissatisfaction) 
when porting procedures are undermined or disregarded by other providers. 

In  addition,  when  ports  take  an  unreasonably  long  time  to  complete,  it  is  ex-
tremely difficult for Charter to compete in those carriers’ service territories because 
a subscriber wishing to move to Charter’s service, and port its numbers to Charter, 
must sometimes wait for as long as 2 weeks before they can switch providers. When 
faced  with  the  response  that  ‘‘it  will  take  2  weeks  before  we  can  begin  to  provide 
you service using the same phone number’’ many subscribers simply decline to con-
tinue the process and remain with the incumbent provider. 

Even despite these hurdles, our experience demonstrates that consumers are crav-
ing voice competition. Market research bears this out. For example, one recent study 
by  Microeconomic  Consulting  and  Research  Associates,  Inc.  (‘‘MICRA’’)  estimates 
that  23.7  million  households  will  subscribe  to  cable  digital  phone  services  by  the 
year  2011.  In  addition,  the  MICRA  study  demonstrates  that  based  on  the  competi-
tive  rates  offered  by  many  cable-telephony  providers,  the  provision  of  competitive 
cable-provided  voice  services  could  result  in  annual  benefits  to  the  economy  of  $1.3 
billion in 2007, climbing to $3.2 billion in 2011. The sum of these potential benefits, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

6 

according to the MICRA study, for the 5-year period is $11.2 billion.1 And according 
to a 2006 J.D. Power report, cable voice customers are saving over $10 a month on 
their  bills.2 In  short,  cable-provided  voice  services  are  fulfilling  Congress’  original 
vision  of  a  robust  and  competitive  residential  voice  services  market.  It  is  no  sur-
prise,  then,  that  the  cable  industry  trade  association,  the  NCTA,  estimates  that  as 
of  the  first  quarter  of  2007  the  cable  industry  is  providing  digital  phone  service  to 
10.8 million customers. 
Number Portability is Vital to the Continued Expansion of Competitive Voice Service 

Offerings 

But  as  our  daily  experience  demonstrates,  this  progress  could  be  so  much  better. 
Indeed, the emergence of a truly competitive market for local voice services is condi-
tioned,  in  large  part,  on  the  continued  development  and  implementation  of  a  na-
tional  number  porting  policy  that  is  clear,  effective,  and  applied  consistently  to  all 
covered providers. 

This  is,  of  course,  a  well  established  fact  that  Congress  has  long  recognized.  But 
the devil is in the implementation details. Indeed, during its work leading up to en-
actment  of  the  pro-competitive  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996,  Congress  noted 
that  the  inability  of  consumers  to  retain  their  telephone  numbers  when  changing 
local  service  providers  undermines  the  development  of  local  competition.  Thus,  by 
specifically  imposing  the  statutory  obligation  on  all  local  exchange  carriers  to  ‘‘pro-
vide  . . .  number  portability  in  accordance  with  requirements  prescribed  by  the 
Commission’’ 3 in  the  1996  Act,  Congress  has  already  recognized  the  critical  impor-
tance of establishing a fundamental number porting duty on all LECs, both incum-
bents and new entrants. 

As  a  result,  Congress  removed  a  significant  barrier  to  competition  by  ensuring 
that  consumers  can  change  carriers  without  having  to  give  up  their  existing  tele-
phone  numbers.  That  simple  function—the  ability  to  retain  your  telephone  number 
when  moving  from  one  provider  to  another—is  a  key  feature  for  most  consumers 
and an essential tool to any competitive provider. The FCC itself has noted that the 
absence of number portability functionality ‘‘likely would deter entry by competitive 
providers  of  local  service  because  of  the  value  customers  place  on  retaining  their 
telephone  numbers.’’ 4 In  implementing  its  rules  to  effectuate  Congress’  mandate  of 
uniform  number  porting  obligations,  the  FCC  specifically  cited  evidence  that  cus-
tomers  would  be  reluctant  to  switch  carriers  if  they  were  required  to  change  tele-
phone  numbers.  Specifically,  the  FCC  found  that  to  the  extent  that  customers  are 
reluctant  to  change  service  providers  due  to  the  absence  of  number  portability,  de-
mand for services provided by new entrants will be depressed. That, in turn, would 
discourage  entry  by  new  competitive  providers  and  thereby  frustrate  the  pro-com-
petitive goals of the 1996 Act.5 

These findings illustrate the fact that effective number porting is critical because 
the ability to retain telephone numbers gives customers greater flexibility in evalu-
ating the quality, price, and variety of services they choose to purchase. As a result, 
customers are empowered to respond to competitive price and service changes with-
out having to change their telephone numbers. 
Porting  Principles  That  Will  Enhance  Competition  and  Further  Benefit 

Consumers 

While  the  policies  established  by  Congress  and  the  FCC  to  date  have  been  bene-
ficial,  the  implementation  of  additional  principles  would  further  enhance  the  com-
petitive  landscape,  and  ultimately  benefit  consumers.  These  principles  revolve 
around  the  goal  of  ensuring  timely  and  efficient  porting  processes  for  all  providers. 
Specifically,  Charter  believes  that  implementation  of  the  following  principles  would 
be  critical  steps  to  achieve  that  goal:  (1)  ensure  that  number  porting  occurs  as 
quickly and efficiently as possible, based upon the delivery of only that information 
which is absolutely necessary to complete a porting request; (2) require all wireline 
providers  to  continue  providing  dial  tone  service  if  a  port  request  is  not,  or  cannot 
be,  completed  at  the  scheduled  time;  and  (3)  reaffirm  that  wireline  providers  may 
not recover any number portability costs via interconnection charges, administrative 

1 See http://www.micradc.com/news/publications/pdfs/MiCRAlReportlonlConsumerl 

BenefitslfromlCable.pdf. 

2 Press  Release,  J.D.  Power  and  Associates  Reports:  Cable  Companies  Dominate  Customer 

Satisfaction Rankings for Local and Long Distance Telephone Service (July 12, 2006). 

3 47 U.S.C. § 251(b)(2). 
4 In  re  Telephone  Number  Portability,  First  Report  and  Order  &  Further  Notice  of  Proposed 

Rulemaking, 11 FCC Rcd. 8352, 8367–68 (1996). 

5 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

7 

service  order  fees,  port  fees,  or  other  ‘‘add-ons’’  to  interconnection  charges  to  other 
providers. 

Based upon the practical experience Charter has gained by competing in multiple 
residential  voice  services  markets,  we  are  confident  that  these  principles,  if  imple-
mented, would further Congress’ goal of reducing barriers to entry and accelerating 
competitive  entry  to  the  business  and  residential  voice  marketplaces.  For  that  rea-
son,  Charter  has  already  filed  comments  with  the  FCC  urging  the  Commission  to 
take actions necessary to implement these principles. 

First,  incumbent  telephone  companies  often  require  requesting  providers,  includ-
ing  Charter,  to  complete  complicated  service  ‘‘order  forms’’  that  require  numerous 
data  points,  many  having  little—if  anything—to  do  with  the  processes  necessary  to 
port a telephone number. This creates barriers to efficient porting and, by extension, 
obstructs facilities-based competition by entities like Charter. By requiring competi-
tors to provide data that is often unrelated to porting, the incumbents have created 
a  process  which  leads  to  an  increase  in  the  number  of  port  requests  that  are  re-
jected,  not  completed,  or  that  require  rescheduling.  There  is  no  reasonable  expla-
nation  or  justification  for  requiring  all  of  the  information  in  these  order  forms.  Ac-
cordingly, when incumbent providers request such information it raises the question 
of whether they are simply using the porting process to delay, or deny, port requests 
by  competitors  in  order  to  delay  market  entry  by  competitors  like  Charter.  If  so, 
such activity raises competitor and consumer costs, creating real barriers to effective 
facilities-based  competition.  For  these  reasons  Charter  believes  that  port  requests 
must  be  validated,  and  completed,  after  the  competitive  provider  supplies  the  min-
imum necessary information to complete the port, generally the name, address, and 
phone number of the subscriber. 

In  addition,  although  the  FCC  has  established  that  all  wireline  providers  must 
complete port requests within four business days, many providers do not. Those pro-
viders that are unable or unwilling to complete the porting interval within that win-
dow are often CLECs, non-RBOC incumbents, or CLECs associated with ILECs that 
operate  in  less  densely  populated  areas  of  the  country.  Many  carriers  in  this  group 
take  well  over  4  days  to  return  a  firm  order  commitment  date  resulting  in  a  time- 
line of anywhere between five and twelve business days to complete a port request. 
Therefore,  another  important  principle  that  could  benefit  competitors  and  con-
sumers  is  that  all  wireline  carriers,  no  matter  their  size  or  position  in  the  market, 
must complete wireline-to-wireline ports within four business days, when requested 
by another provider, consistent with existing FCC rules. 

Second,  there  are  some  instances  when  a  port  request  is  scheduled  to  occur,  but 
for  one  reason  or  another  the  request  can  not  be  completed  because  of  an  oper-
ational  or  customer  issue.  When  a  port  request  can  not  be  completed  before  5  p.m. 
on  the  day  of  the  scheduled  port,  some  providers  will  simply  terminate  service  to 
the  subscriber  rather  than  wait  for  the  port  to  be  completed  at  a  later  time.  When 
this happens Charter is able to provide service on an emergency basis to make sure 
that  the  subscriber  will  continue  to  have  access  to  voice  services  while  the  port  is 
completed; however, a new number must be assigned to that customer and dial tone 
is typically interrupted for one or more days. This policy of simply terminating serv-
ice  upon  the  scheduled  port  date,  regardless  of  whether  the  number  has  actually 
been  ported,  and  even  with  an  emergency  installation  of  service  using  an  alternate 
phone number, creates significant problems for the affected subscribers. This entire 
process  leaves  the  customer  with  the  impression  that  Charter  (rather  than  the  in-
cumbent  who  caused  the  issue)  is  to  blame  for  a  loss  of  service,  and  unnecessarily 
puts  the  subscriber  in  harms  way  by  denying  consumers  access  to  basic  local  voice 
services for a period of time. Thus, all providers should adopt a policy of not termi-
nating numbers from their switch for at least forty-eight (48) hours after the sched-
uled  port  request  is  completed.  This  would  ensure  that  customers  do  not  lose  serv-
ice,  or  access  to  their  telephone  number,  in  the  event  that  a  port  can  not  be  com-
pleted on the scheduled date. 

Finally,  in  addition  to  the  practices  described  above,  several  carriers  continue  to 
attempt  to  impose  carrier-to-carrier  charges,  fees,  or  ‘‘add-ons’’  to  such  charges,  for 
completing customer requests to port a number from the carrier’s network to Char-
ter’s network. Although the FCC has repeatedly ruled that carriers must recover the 
costs  of  number  portability  via  tariffed  end-user  charges,  rather  than  via  charges 
on  competing  carriers,  several  incumbent  carriers  continue  to  ignore  those  rulings 
and  act  in  blatant  disregard  of  the  FCC’s  directives.  Some  providers  attempt  to 
mask these charges, and claim that they are associated with the recovery of ‘‘admin-
istrative  costs’’  related  to  porting,  despite  the  fact  that  these  actions  clearly  cover 
costs associated with completing port requests. Accordingly, another principle essen-
tial  to  continuing  the  competitive  benefits  of  efficient  number  porting  is  the  notion 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

8 

that  incumbent  LECs  may  not  recover  any  costs  associated  with  porting  via  any 
charge, fee, or add-ons to interconnection charges to other providers. 

In conclusion, implementation of these principles would further the establishment 
of  fair  and  efficient  number  porting  processes  for  competitive  providers.  Such  proc-
esses  are  necessary  because  there  are  essentially  no  market  forces  in  place  to  pro-
vide  incentives  to  incumbent  providers  to  develop  efficient  porting  practices.  Be-
cause  incumbent  providers  are  currently  losing  far  more  customers  than  they  are 
gaining,  they  have  no  market-based  incentive  to  implement  efficient  processes  to 
port numbers to competitive providers such as Charter. 

Implementation  of  these  principles  will  further  enable  competitive  providers  like 
Charter  to  increase  existing  efforts  to  provide  competitive  voice  services  in  many 
smaller,  and  more  rural  markets,  to  the  benefit  of  both  consumers  and  businesses 
in such markets. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  will 
be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you  or  the  other  committee  members  may  have. 

The CHAIRMAN [presiding]. I thank you very much, I’m sorry I’m 

late. 

Our next witness is Mr. Jonathon Banks. Mr. Banks? 

STATEMENT OF JONATHAN BANKS, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

LAW AND POLICY, USTELECOM ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  BANKS.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  and  Vice  Chairman 
Stevens. I’m pleased to be here to discuss USTelecom’s perspective 
on the Same Number Act of 2007. 

Number  porting  is  hard  in  today’s  landscape  of  competition  for 
consumers  and  the  voice  services  they  are  looking  for.  Porting  re-
quirements began in the wireline world, and were extended in 2003 
to  wireless  carriers.  Since  that  time,  there  have  been  over  57  mil-
lion ports, according to FCC statistics. Just over half of those ports 
have  been  between  wireline  carriers  and  under  3  percent  have  in-
volved customers taking their number from a wireline carrier, to a 
wireless carrier. 

The  processes  for  porting  have  steadily  improved  over  time,  and 
this is certainly true for intermodal ports. One of our member com-
panies  reports  that  for  all  of  2006,  the  number  of  complaints  they 
received,  concerning  intermodal  ports,  was  nine,  and  that’s  out  of 
900,000 intermodal ports that that company performed. 

USTelecom  and  its  members  have  been  very  instrumental  in 
bringing  number  portability  to  American  consumers,  and  we’ve 
done  this  in  a  number  of  ways.  One  way,  beginning  in  January  of 
2003,  was  getting  together  with  CTIA,  and  putting  together  a 
group of technical experts, to look at some of the current—the prob-
lems  in  2003—that  were  occurring  in  intermodal  porting,  and  to 
work  out  solutions  to  those  problems.  That  group  worked  well, 
there  was  a  backlog  for  various  reasons,  it  was  eliminated  due  to 
the, kind of, inter-industry cooperation to improve the process. 

The  other  area  where  our  member  companies  and  USTelecom 
has been very active, is with the industry standards bodies that are 
reviewing  the  porting  process,  and  the  ordering  process.  The  lead-
ing  group  in  this  area  is  the  North  American  Numbering  Council, 
it’s  often  referred  to  as  NANC.  NANC  is  a  Federal  Advisory  Com-
mittee made up of representatives from carriers from across the in-
dustry,  from  trade  associations,  and  consumer  advocates  and  rep-
resentatives of state public service commissions. 

The other key industry group is the Ordering and Billing Forum, 
which  looks  at  the  ordering  forms  involved  in  this  process,  and  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

9 

ordering other services from our companies. Those two groups have 
worked  long  and  hard  on  the  number  porting  process,  to  develop 
the  right  ordering  forms,  and  the  right  processes  and  procedures. 
In  fact,  in  2003,  the  FCC  asked  NANC  to  review  the  intermodal 
porting process, and come up with suggestions. NANC appointed a 
working  group  that  spent  thousands  of  hours  looking  at  the  proc-
esses,  and  understanding  them  from  the  wireline  side,  and  the 
wireless side, to come up with a range of potential solutions. NANC 
did  that,  and  attached  some  cost  estimates  to  solutions.  Some  of 
the  solutions  are  extremely  expensive  and,  according  to  NANC, 
would cost a billion dollars or more to implement. 

Our  members  believe  that  the  continued  streamlining  and  im-
provements  in  porting  processes  are  important.  The  efficiencies 
save  them  money.  But  we  believe  the  best  place  for  improvements 
to  occur  is  in  these  industry  standards  bodies,  where  all  the  af-
fected  carriers  can  get  together  and  work  out  solutions  that  serve 
consumers, and are implementable. 

I’d  like  to  make  just  a  couple  of  quick  points,  about  allegations 
that  the  process  of  porting  is  too  complicated.  First,  as  both  com-
petitive  carriers  on  the  wireline  side,  and  incumbent  wireline  car-
riers  have  made  clear,  and  as  NANC  has  found,  the  wireline  net-
work  is  a  complicated  network,  and  it’s  different  from  the  wireless 
network, and the two can’t be treated the same. 

In fact, on the wireline side, there’s also a large number of small-
er  and  rural  carriers  that  do  not  have  automated  processes  for 
porting numbers, and this can require flexibility on the part of car-
riers that have to deal with these smaller companies. 

Second,  the  complexity  of  ordering  ports  has  been  substantially 
overstated.  Although  some  wireless  carriers  have  pointed  to  a  ge-
neric ordering form that contains over 100 fields, they haven’t been 
very forthright at clarifying that only about 25 of those fields have 
to be filled out to order a port. 

Now,  that  form  was  developed  by  the  Ordering  and  Billing 
Forum,  as  a  generic  form  so  that  carriers  could  use  it  to  order  a 
broad range of services. Not all of those fields have to be filled out 
on any particular order, and as I said, roughly 25 need to be filled 
out  to  order  a  port.  But  a  number  of  those  fields  can  be  automati-
cally populated by the carrier ordering the port—fields that ask for 
the  company’s  name  and  contact  information  at  the  company,  in 
case something goes wrong. 

Finally,  allegations  that  30  percent  of  requests  for  intermodal 
ports  are  canceled,  appear  to  us  to  have  no  basis  in  fact.  Some  of 
our  largest  members  operate  both  wireless  and  wireline  networks, 
and have not noted a problem of that magnitude with cancellations. 
Some  of  our  smaller  members  have  tracked  data  on  cancellations, 
and their data shows that the cancellation rate is about 5 percent, 
which is the same as it is among wireless carriers. 

Mr. Chairman, we also appreciate the opportunity to comment on 
the Same Number Act of 2007. As I indicated in my written state-
ment,  there  are  two  issues  on  which  we  would  like  to  continue  to 
work with the Committee, but our members do endorse the goal of 
this  legislation,  which  is  to  further  streamline  the  process  of 
porting. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

10 

Thank  you,  again,  for  the  opportunity  to  appear,  and  I  look  for-

ward to working with the Committee on this issue. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Banks follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JONATHAN BANKS, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

LAW AND POLICY, USTELECOM ASSOCIATION 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, members of the Committee: Thank you 
for  this  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  am  Jonathan  Banks,  Senior  Vice 
President for Law and Policy for the USTelecom Association. I am pleased to appear 
before  this  committee  to  discuss  USTelecom’s  perspective  on  telephone  number 
porting, as well as the provisions of the proposed ‘‘Same Number Act of 2007.’’ 

USTelecom  represents  innovative  companies  ranging  from  the  smallest  rural 
telecoms in the Nation to some of the largest corporations in the U.S. economy. Our 
member  companies  offer  a  wide  range  of  services  across  the  communications  land-
scape,  including  voice,  video  and  data  over  local  exchange,  long  distance,  Internet, 
and  cable  networks.  USTelecom  is  the  Nation’s  most  established—and  largest—as-
sociation representing rural telecom providers. 

USTelecom  and  its  member  companies  have  been  instrumental  in  bringing  num-
ber  portability  to  American  consumers  and  have  made  significant  contributions  to-
ward  making  portability  more  efficient.  For  over  a  decade,  our  members  have  seen 
number  portability  become  an  increasingly  important  facet  of  a  competitive  tele-
communications  service  marketplace.  However,  the  introduction  of  communications 
platforms  different  from  traditional  wireline—including  cable  systems,  fixed  wire-
less,  and  mobile  wireless—has  made  the  process  more  complex.  Our  members  have 
a strong interest in improving the efficiency of the number porting process, and we 
agree that inter-modal porting could be further streamlined. 

To  put  number  portability  in  perspective,  since  November  2003  when  portability 
was  extended  to  wireless  carriers,  there  have  been  approximately  57  million  ports. 
Fewer  than  3  percent  of  these  ports  have  involved  customers  moving  from  wireline 
to  wireless.  In  addition,  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  has  been  active 
on  porting  issues,  and  it  is  not  an  area  over  which  the  Federal  Communications 
Commission lacks statutory authority. The Commission has the requisite authority, 
and  has  exercised  it  accordingly.  Since  1997,  the  wireline  local  exchange  carrier 
community has worked tirelessly—and with a high level of efficiency—to implement 
Federal  mandates  addressing  local  number  portability.  In  2003,  the  FCC  issued  an 
order  mandating  both  wireless  number  portability  and  portability  between  wireline 
and wireless networks. Despite technical challenges, local exchange carriers have co-
operated  and  contributed  significant  energy  to  support  inter-modal  number  port-
ability. 

In January 2003, USTelecom and CTIA formed a joint working group to solve the 
early  technical  and  implementation  problems  inherent  in  inter-modal  porting.  Ex-
perts  from  member  companies  worked  together  to  investigate  the  cause  of  inter- 
modal porting failures and to come up with solutions to alleviate the backlog of con-
sumer porting requests. The working group discovered that the clearinghouses used 
by the wireless carriers were not equipped to handle port request validation queries, 
so  many  requests  were  simply  dropped  without  either  side  knowing  why.  The  com-
bined USTelecom-CTIA team determined the appropriate technical requirements for 
clearinghouses  to  meet.  The  group  also  decided  that  until  the  clearinghouses  could 
automate inter-modal porting, protocols for manual porting should be implemented. 
These  changes  have  resulted  in  substantial  improvement.  For  example,  one  of  our 
member companies reports that for all of 2006, the company received a total of nine 
porting complaints out of approximately 900,000 number ports. 

On  November  10,  2003,  the  FCC  asked  the  North  American  Numbering  Council 
(NANC) to offer suggestions for improving inter-modal porting. The NANC is a Fed-
eral  Advisory  Committee  comprised  of  representatives  from  carriers,  trade  associa-
tions  such  as  CTIA,  USTelecom  and  NCTA,  cable  operators,  VoIP  providers,  and 
consumer  advocates.  The  committee  advises  the  FCC  and  makes  recommendations 
based  on  committee  consensus.  The  Commission  has  identified  the  NANC’s  tasks 
and  objectives  in  multiple  Commission  proceedings,  and  number  portability  is  one 
of those tasks. 

A  NANC  working  group  consisting  of  both  USTelecom  member  companies  and 
wireless carriers generated two proposals, and on May 3, 2004, the NANC sent Wil-
liam  Maher,  Chief  of  the  FCC’s  Wireline  Competition  Bureau,  a  formal  report.  The 
‘‘Report  &  Recommendation  on  Intermodal  Porting  Intervals’’  recommended  a 
porting  procedure  that  would  shorten  porting  times  and  also  identified  additional 
issues that need to be addressed by industry and regulatory bodies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

11 

USTelecom’s  members  believe  that  porting  is  best  addressed  by  the  Commission, 
working in conjunction with the North American Numbering Council. Currently, the 
NANC  and  the  Ordering  and  Billing  Forum  (OBF)  have  ongoing  efforts  to  resolve 
issues  of  inter-modal  porting.  We  believe  that  these  two  industry  organizations  are 
well-suited  to  address  the  streamlining  of  the  porting  process,  and  they  will  do  so 
with  consumer  well-being  in  mind.  Already,  their  ongoing  evaluation  of  porting 
practices  is  geared  toward  reducing  inter-modal  porting  intervals  and  making  the 
porting process more satisfactory to consumers. 

USTelecom  encourages  the  continuation  of  joint  government-industry  working 
groups like the NANC, and its Local Number Portability Working Group sub-group. 
This  working  group  has  successfully  resolved  issue  after  issue  and  will  continue  to 
do  so.  At  the  end  of  my  statement  I  have  affixed  a  table  summarizing  the  working 
group’s results to date. We feel that these groups should remain the primary source 
for  technical  solutions.  The  communications  industry  has  shown  repeatedly  that  it 
can  solve  technical  issues  through  innovation  and  market-driven  solutions,  and 
USTelecom  supports  the  continuation  of  entrepreneurial  problem-solving  with  re-
spect to local number portability. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we  also  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  comment  on  the  ‘‘Same 
Number Act of 2007.’’ Our members endorse the ostensible goal of this proposed leg-
islation, which is to further streamline the number portability process. Furthermore, 
we  agree  with  the  content  of  Section  715(a)  in  the  proposed  bill,  which  establishes 
a duty of all voice service providers to provide number portability. 

However,  as  the  Committee  continues  to  perfect  this  bill,  let  me  offer  two 
thoughts.  First,  while  section  715(b)  requires  in  paragraph  (1)  the  establishment  of 
‘‘reciprocal  number  portability  standards,’’  subparagraphs  (B)  and  (b)(2)  permit  dis-
criminatory  treatment  of  providers  given  the  Commission’s  authority  to  ‘‘establish 
more  flexible  standards  or  delayed  deadlines  for  different  classes  of  providers.’’ 
USTelecom  members  are  invariably  on  the  receiving  end  of  these  more  onerous  re-
quirements. 

Second, Section 715(c) would require voice service providers to report to the Com-
mission on their porting activities for the 12 months preceding the date of issuance 
of  Section  715(b)  required  porting  rules.  This  is  an  overly  onerous  requirement.  As 
I mentioned earlier, there have been more than 57 million ports since November of 
2003.  To  report  on  this  activity  and  explain  why  any  given  port  fails  would  be  an 
overwhelmingly burdensome undertaking. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  today.  USTelecom 
member  companies  have  always  cooperated  in  numerous  industry  fora  for  the  im-
provement  of  telecommunications  services,  and  we  will  continue  to  do  so. 
USTelecom and its member companies look forward to our continued work with the 
Committee  and  will  continue  to  work  through  the  Commission  and  NANC  to 
streamline the porting process. 

North American Numbering Council—April 10, 2007 

Local Number Portability Administration Working Group Status of Open Industry Issues and 

Issues Submitted and/or Resolved Since May 2004 

Issues Submitted: 

Issues Resolved: 
Issues Remaining Open or Unresolved: 
Percentage of Issues 
Resolved: 

122 
96 
26 

79% 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Banks. 
And,  may  I  now  recognize  Mr.  Chris  Guttman-McCabe,  Vice 

President, Regulatory Affairs, CTIA—The Wireless Association®. 

STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER GUTTMAN-MCCABE, 

VICE PRESIDENT, REGULATORY AFFAIRS, 

CTIA—THE WIRELESS ASSOCIATION® 

Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  Thank  you.  Good  morning,  Chairman 
Inouye and Vice Chairman Stevens. Thank you for the opportunity 
to  appear  before  you  today,  to  discuss  the  importance  of  stream-
lining the number porting process. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

12 

On behalf of CTIA—The Wireless Association®, I am Christopher 
Guttman-McCabe,  Vice  President  of  Regulatory  Affairs.  I  am  here 
to testify that the wireless industry has developed an efficient and 
simple porting process that should be the model for all porting. We 
believe  that  reform  consistent  with  this  model  is  necessary  to  en-
sure  that  consumers  can  take  full  advantage  of  the  choices  pro-
vided by emerging, intermodal competition. 

In  1996,  with  the  leadership  of  this  Committee,  Congress  added 
section 251(b)(2) to the Communications Act, requiring all local ex-
change  carriers  to  offer  number  portability.  The  Federal  Commu-
nications Commission later extended that requirement to the wire-
less industry. 

Wireless carriers responded to the porting requirement by adopt-
ing  a  limited,  but  standardized,  set  of  criteria  necessary  to  com-
plete  a  simple  porting  request.  This  process  has  been  further 
streamlined  to  include  just  a  few  elements—lowering  the  average 
time to complete a customer porting request to just two and a half 
hours. 

During  the  second  quarter  of  2006,  the  most  recent  data  avail-
able,  wireless  carriers  successfully 
implemented  2.4  million 
intramodal ports, wireless-to-wireless, allowing wireless consumers 
to  change  carriers  easily  and  efficiently,  while  keeping  their  tele-
phone numbers. 

CTIA  member  companies  seek  to  grow,  not  just  by  taking  cus-
tomers  from  one  another,  but  also  by  marketing  their  services  as 
a  replacement  for  traditional  landline  service.  Unfortunately,  the 
unnecessary  complexity  of  wireline-to-wireless  porting,  often  forces 
consumers  to  abandon  their  landline  numbers,  or  give  up  on  the 
process  entirely.  Neither  outcome  should  be  acceptable  to  policy-
makers. 

In  the  Wireless  Porting  Order,  the  Commission  unambiguously 
determined  that  consumers  must  be  able  to  change  carriers,  while 
keeping  their  telephone  numbers,  as  easily  as  they  may  change 
carriers without taking their numbers. The Commission also stated 
that  carriers  need  only  share  basic  contact  and  technical  informa-
tion sufficient to perform the port. 

Unfortunately,  despite  clear  direction  from  both  Congress  and 
the  Commission,  the  benefits  of  speedy,  efficient,  and  simple 
porting are not yet available to all consumers. Many local exchange 
carriers unnecessarily complicate the porting process, and frustrate 
consumers  by  requiring  the  porting-in  carrier  to  provide  informa-
tion well beyond what is needed to effectuate a successful port. 

While  the  Commission  has  allowed  market  forces  to  dictate  spe-
cific procedures to be used for number portability, it must recognize 
that  the  incumbent  local  exchange  carriers  generally  lack  both  the 
incentive  to  allow  customers  to  switch  seamlessly  to  a  competitor, 
as well as the interest in remedying the situation expeditiously. 

In fact, a number of local exchange carriers have urged the Com-
mission  to  defer  to  the  NANC,  or  the  ATIS  Ordering  and  Billing 
Formum,  to  resolve  these  measures.  Unfortunately,  the  issue  has 
been before these groups since July, 2004, and they have been un-
able  to  reach  the  consensus  required  to  resolve  these  porting  vali-
dation issues. It is time for the Commission to intervene. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

13 

The  T-Mobile/Sprint  petition  filed  last  December  provides  the 
Commission with the timely opportunity for such intervention. Two 
facts from the petition suggest that action is warranted. 

First,  the  inefficiency  of  the  LEC  process  is  starkly  highlighted 
when it is compared to the intramodal wireless porting mechanism 
in  use  today.  For  simple  wireless-to-wireless  ports,  numbers  are 
usually  ported  in  a  matter  of  hours,  whereas  those  involving  the 
LECs often take days, or weeks. 

In  wireless-to-wireless  ports,  consumers  are  generally  unable  to 
detect  any  difference  between  changing  carriers  with  porting,  and 
changing carriers without porting. 

Second,  the  difference  in  the  amount  of  information  required  to 
finalize  the  two  different  types  of  ports  also  is  stark.  Wireless  car-
riers initially required nine data fields to port a customer, then cut 
it to four, and now—at times—three. In contrast, Sprint and T-Mo-
bile attached to their filing a sample form with multiple data fields, 
including  fields  requiring  additional  engineering,  additional  forms, 
additional  labor,  and  account  regrade.  It  is  difficult  to  understand 
how this much information could be required to effectuate a simple 
port  from  one  carrier  to  another,  especially  when  T-Mobile  and 
Sprint  have  limited  the  application  of  their  requests  solely  to  sim-
ple ports. 

In  wireless-to-wireless  ports,  a  large  number  of  ports  are  com-
pleted,  less  information  is  exchanged,  yet  the  port  takes  less  time, 
and is more successful. T-Mobile, Sprint, and others within CTIA’s 
membership are not alone in recognizing the need for reform of the 
intermodal porting process. 

A  number  of  cable  operators,  public  utility  commissions,  and 
NARUC have recognized the importance of pro-consumer reform in 
this area. Commission action on this matter is timely, as the Com-
mission  itself  has  repeatedly  cited  expectations  of  increased  inter-
modal  competition  in  approving  recent  mergers.  Streamlining  the 
simple porting process is critical to making robust intermodal com-
petition a reality. 

Before closing, let me note that CTIA appreciates the interest the 
Committee  and  its  members—especially  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and 
Vice  Chairman  Stevens—that  you  have  shown  in  this  issue.  While 
CTIA believes the FCC has the authority it needs to streamline the 
simple porting process, Congressional action to facilitate a pro-com-
petitive,  pro-consumer,  intermodal  porting  process  may  be  nec-
essary  if  the  Commission  fails  to  act  in  a  timely  manner.  Should 
that be the case, we would look forward to working with the Com-
mittee to achieve those goals. 

Thank  you,  and  I  look  forward  to  any  questions  you  may  have. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Guttman-McCabe follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER GUTTMAN-MCCABE, VICE PRESIDENT, 

REGULATORY AFFAIRS, CTIA—THE WIRELESS ASSOCIATION® 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and members of the Committee, thank 
you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  importance  of 
streamlining the number porting process. On behalf of CTIA—The Wireless Associa-
tion®,  I  am  here  to  tell  you  that  the  wireless  industry  has  developed  an  efficient 
simple porting process that should be a model for the entire industry. At CTIA, we 
view  reform  consistent  with  the  wireless  model  as  necessary  to  ensure  that  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

sumers can take full advantage of the choices provided by emerging intermodal com-
petition. 

14 

In  1996,  with  the  leadership  of  this  Committee,  Congress  added  section  251(b)(2) 
to the Communications Act. That section requires all local exchange carriers to offer 
number portability. The Federal Communications Commission later determined that 
the  public  interest  would  be  served  by  extending  the  number  portability  require-
ment to wireless carriers as well. 

Wireless  carriers  responded  to  the  Commission’s  call  for  wireless  number  port-
ability  by  adopting  a  limited  but  standardized  set  of  criteria  necessary  to  complete 
a  simple  porting  request.  Over  time,  this  process  has  evolved  to  include  just  a  few 
elements,  and  with  implementation  of  this  streamlined  process,  the  industry  has 
lowered  the  average  time  to  complete  a  customer  porting  request  to  just  two  and 
a half hours. During the second quarter of 2006 (the most recent quarter for which 
data is available), wireless carriers successfully implemented 2.4 million intramodal 
ports.  This  process  enables  wireless  consumers  to  change  carriers  easily  and  effi-
ciently  while  keeping  their  telephone  numbers,  thus  empowering  consumers  to 
choose the carrier, pricing plan, and features that best serve their individual needs. 
CTIA’s  member  companies  seek  to  grow  not  just  by  taking  customers  from  one 
another,  but  also  by  marketing  their  services  as  a  replacement  for  traditional 
landline  service.  Unfortunately,  the  unnecessary  complexity  of  wireline  to  wireless 
porting often forces consumers to abandon their landline numbers or give up on the 
process entirely. Neither outcome should be acceptable to policymakers. 

In  the  Wireless  Porting  Order,  the  Commission  unambiguously  determined  that 
‘‘consumers  must  be  able  to  change  carriers  while  keeping  their  telephone  number 
as easily as they may change carriers without taking their number with them.’’ The 
Commission also stated that carriers may not impose ‘‘restrictions on porting beyond 
necessary  customer  validation  procedures’’  and  that  ‘‘carriers  need  only  share  basic 
contact and technical information sufficient to perform the port.’’ Unfortunately, de-
spite  clear  direction  from  both  the  Congress  and  the  Commission,  the  benefits  of 
speedy,  efficient,  and  simple  porting  are  not  yet  available  to  all  consumers.  Many 
local  exchange  carriers  unnecessarily  complicate  the  porting  process  and  frustrate 
consumers  by  requiring  the  porting-in  carrier  to  provide  information  well  beyond 
what is needed to effectuate a successful port. 

While the Commission has allowed market forces to dictate the specific procedures 
to  be  used  for  number  portability,  it  must  recognize  that  the  incumbent  local  ex-
change  carriers  generally  lack  both  any  incentive  to  allow  customers  to  switch 
seamlessly off their networks to wireless competitors, as well as an interest in rem-
edying this situation expeditiously. In fact, in comments to the Commission a num-
ber  of  local  exchange  carriers  have  urged  the  Commission  to  defer  to  the  North 
American Numbering Council (‘‘NANC’’) or the Alliance for Telecommunications In-
dustry Solutions (‘‘ATIS’’) Ordering and Billing Forum to resolve these matters. Un-
fortunately, these industry groups have been unable to reach the consensus required 
to resolve these porting validation issues. The issue has been before the NANC and 
ATIS since July 2004, and the Ordering and Billing Forum (‘‘OBF’’) is in the process 
of  formally  closing  the  matter.  Given  that  these  entities  have  been  struggling  with 
these  issues  for  3  years  without  resolution,  it  is  time  for  the  Commission  to  inter-
vene. 

The T-Mobile/Sprint petition filed last December provides the Commission with a 
timely  opportunity  for  such  intervention.  Two  undisputed  facts  from  the  T-Mobile/ 
Sprint petition suggest some action is warranted with respect to intermodal porting 
procedures. First, the inefficiency of the incumbent LEC validation process is stark-
ly  highlighted  when  it  is  compared  to  the  intramodal  wireless  porting  mechanism 
in  use  today.  For  simple  wireless-to-wireless  ports,  numbers  are  usually  ported  in 
a matter of hours with a nominal amount of information exchanged by the carriers. 
In  such  ports,  wireless  consumers  are  generally  unable  to  detect  any  difference  be-
tween changing carriers with porting and changing carriers without porting. Second, 
wireless  carriers  initially  required  nine  data  fields  to  port  a  customer,  then—basi-
cally because that made the process less efficient and the additional fields were not 
needed  to  protect  customers’  choices—cut  it  to  four,  then  three,  data  fields.  This  is 
clear evidence that a less burdensome and uniform process can work quickly to pro-
tect consumers and competition in a commercial environment. 

Sprint  and  T-Mobile  attached  to  their  filing  a  sample  form  with  more  than  100 
data  fields,  including  fields  requiring  input  of  ‘‘additional  engineering,’’  ‘‘additional 
forms,’’  ‘‘additional  labor,’’  and  ‘‘account  regrade.’’  It  is  difficult  to  understand  how 
this  much  information  could  be  required  to  port  a  customer  from  one  carrier  to  an-
other—especially  since  T-Mobile  and  Sprint  have  recognized  that  additional  infor-
mation  is  often  necessary  for  validation  when  undertaking  ‘‘complex’’  porting,  and 
have  limited  the  application  of  their  recommended  four  validation  fields  solely  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

15 

simple ports. Simple ports are those that: (i) do not involve unbundled network ele-
ments;  (ii)  involve  an  account  only  for  a  single  line;  (iii)  do  not  include  complex 
switch  translations  (e.g.,  Centrex,  ISDN,  AIN  services,  remote  call  forwarding,  or 
multiple services on the loop); and (iv) do not include a reseller. 

T-Mobile,  Sprint,  and  others  within  CTIA’s  membership  are  not  alone  in  recog-
nizing the need for reform of the intermodal porting process. A number of cable op-
erators that are now offering telephony generally share our views, and public utility 
commissions from states as diverse as California and Iowa also have recognized the 
importance of pro-consumer reform in this area. In fact, in a resolution adopted this 
past  February,  NARUC  endorsed  the  adoption  of  a  ‘‘simple  and  uniform  industry 
porting  process.’’  Even  parties  which  oppose  the  T-Mobile/Sprint  petition,  like 
Embarq  and  AT&T,  acknowledge  that  reform  intended  to  eliminate  obstruction  or 
delay  is  ‘‘reasonable’’  (Embarq  comments,  at  1)  and  that  ‘‘streamlining  of  the 
[porting process] may be useful and desirable’’ (AT&T comments, at 3). 

Commission action on this matter is timely, as the Commission itself has repeat-
edly cited expectations of increased intermodal competition in approving several re-
cent  mergers.  Streamlining  the  simple  porting  process  is  critical  to  making  robust 
intermodal  competition  a  reality,  and  the  Commission  now  must  rise  to  the  chal-
lenge  before  it  in  a  way  that  advances  intermodal  competition  and,  most  impor-
tantly, the interests of consumers. 

Before closing, let me note that CTIA appreciates the interest the Committee and 
its  members,  especially  Senator  Stevens,  have  shown  in  this  issue.  While  CTIA  be-
lieves that the FCC has the authority it needs to streamline the simple porting proc-
ess,  Congressional  action  to  facilitate  a  pro-competitive,  pro-consumer  intermodal 
porting process may be necessary if the Commission fails to act in a timely manner. 
Should  that  be  the  case,  we  would  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee  to 
achieve those goals. 

Thank you, and I look forward to any questions you may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Our next witness is Mr. Tony Clark, Commissioner of North Da-
kota  Public  Service  Commission,  and  Chairman  of  the  Tele-
communications  Committee  of  the  National  Association  of  Regu-
latory Utility Commissioners. Long title. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TONY CLARK, COMMISSIONER, 

NORTH DAKOTA PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION; 
CHAIRMAN, TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMMITTEE, 
NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF REGULATORY UTILITY 

COMMISSIONERS (NARUC) 

Mr. CLARK. It is. That’s why we say NARUC, usually. 
Mr. Chairman, and Mr. Vice Chairman, thank you for the invita-
tion  to  speak  before  you  today  on  behalf  of  Utility  Commissioners 
across  the  country.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present, 
again, our Association’s views before this Committee. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  simply  note  that  NARUC  has  been  an 
early  and  persistent  advocate  for  number  portability.  Over  the 
years, we’ve filed numerous pleadings, agreeing with the FCC’s as-
sessment that the competition resulting from portability should fos-
ter  lower  local  telephone  prices,  and  consequently,  stimulate  de-
mand  for  telecommunications  services,  and  increase  economic 
growth. 

As this hearing suggests, there are some outstanding issues that 
need  resolution.  Most  recently,  in  January  of  this  year,  the  FCC 
noticed a comment on a December 2006 T-Mobile and Sprint/Nextel 
petition  for  declaratory  ruling,  asking  the  FCC  to  end  an  ongoing 
controversy  regarding  the  Commission’s  requirement  that  only 
‘‘necessary’’ validation procedures be utilized in the porting process. 
The petitioners, citing unwarranted delays in the process, seek a 
ruling  that  all  carriers  be  obligated  to  provide  number  portability, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

16 

may  not  obstruct  or  delay  the  porting  process  by  demanding  from 
the  porting-in  carrier  information  in  excess  of  the  minimum  infor-
mation needed to validate the requesting customer. 

While portability has generally worked well to stave off exhaust, 
and  to  promote  competition,  some  concerns  raised  by  that  petition 
highlight  some  problems  with  the  current  process  and  seem  par-
ticularly relevant to the draft legislation we understand may be in-
troduced on this issue. 

In February of this year, our Association responded to the notice 
by  passing  a  resolution  addressing  the  Sprint/T-Mobile  proceeding 
that  specifically  endorses  a  porting  process  that  is  uniform 
throughout  the  industry,  and  relatively  simple  to  implement.  A 
copy of that resolution is submitted with my testimony. 

The  ability  of  any  carrier  to  effectively  port  in  a  customer  is  di-
rectly  tied  to  the  practices  of  the  carrier  that  will  be  porting  out 
the  customer.  Sprint  and  T-Mobile  have  told  the  FCC  that  some 
carriers  have  adopted  practices  that  complicate  and  prolong  the 
porting  out  process,  and  thus  hinder  the  effectiveness  of  competi-
tion.  They  point  out  that  these  practices,  in  fact,  delay  a  competi-
tor’s  ability  to  activate  the  number—often  for  weeks  or  months— 
resulting in, in their words, a frustrating customer experience, and 
unnecessarily  high  port  cancellation  rate,  and  ultimately  a  barrier 
to competition. 

The  current  statistics  that  are  cited  in  that  particular  docket 
seem to bear out that there is some sort of problem. While the con-
sumer  cancellation  rate  for  intramodal—that  is  to  say,  wireline-to- 
wireline  ports—is  about  5  percent,  the  cancellation  rate  for  inter-
modal ports—that is wireless-to-wireline—is approximately 30 per-
cent. They also argue that onerous and non-standard ILEC valida-
tion  procedures  are  the  root  cause  for  the  disparity  in  those  rates. 
NARUC  has  taken  the  position  that,  at  a  minimum,  the  FCC 
must investigate to see if a more streamlined process like that that 
works so well in the wireless-to-wireless environment, can work in 
the intermodal ports. 

NARUC  has  urged  the  FCC  to  immediately  act  to  prohibit  oner-
ous  and  non-standard  porting  practices  as  anti-competitive  and 
anti-consumer.  The  statistics  on  porting  cited  in  this  open  docket 
suggest both the Commission’s, and Congress’s primary purpose in 
establishing  portability  obligations  is  being  frustrated.  Something, 
we  believe,  must  be  causing  almost  a  third  of  customers  to  cancel 
their  wireline-to-wireless  ports.  We  may  not  know  what  it  is,  but 
something must be happening. 

We  have  urged  the  Commission  to—at  a  minimum—clarify  its 
2003  ruling  that  carriers  may  not  impose  restrictions  on  porting, 
the  unnecessary  validation  procedures.  And  while  we  took  no  spe-
cific  stance  on  the  specific  T-Mobile/Sprint  proposal,  we  also  urged 
the FCC to establish a uniform industry porting process, to assure 
that  all  service  providers  comply  with  uniform  industry  porting 
guidelines,  and  work  cooperatively  with  other  carriers  in  resolving 
disputes. 

We  hope  that  Congress’s  interest  in  this  issue  will—at  a  min-
imum—provide  additional  information  and  incentives  for  FCC  ac-
tion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

17 

That  concludes  my  testimony,  I’d  be  happy  to  answer  any  ques-

tions you might have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Clark follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON.  TONY CLARK,  COMMISSIONER,  NORTH DAKOTA 
PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION;  CHAIRMAN,  TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMMITTEE, 
NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF REGULATORY UTILITY COMMISSIONERS (NARUC) 

Introduction 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens and members of the Committee, as al-
ways,  we  are  extremely  grateful  to  each  of  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today 
on Number Portability. 

I am Tony Clark, commissioner with the North Dakota Public Service Commission 
and  a  member  of  the  National  Association  of  Regulatory  Utility  Commissioners 
(NARUC).  I  serve  as  chairman  of  NARUC’s  Committee  on  Telecommunications. 
NARUC  represents  State  utility  commissioners  in  each  of  your  States  and  the  U.S. 
territories  that  have  oversight  responsibilities  over  telecommunications,  energy, 
water and other utilities. 

State Commissions Share Your Concerns and are a Valuable Source of non-biased 
Expert Advice on the Impact of Any Policy Choices on Constituents in your Respective 
States. 

Some  State  commissioners,  like  me,  stand  for  election  as  each  of  you  do.  Others 
are  appointed  by  our  Governors.  But  every  single  State  Commissioner,  as  a  leader 
in  each  of  your  States,  is,  like  you,  ultimately  accountable  to  the  voters.  Your  State 
commissioners share your commitment to assuring that each of your constituents re-
ceives  the  benefits  of  broadband  convergence,  new  wireless  technologies  and  com-
petitive  markets.  In  almost  all  cases,  the  Commissioners  on  your  State  commission 
will  have  an  intense  and  almost  complete  identity  of  interest  with  you  on  policy 
goals for your respective States. Perhaps of more significant to each of you, they will 
have a firm grasp on the markets in your State and informed and non-biased expert 
opinions on how your policy choices may impact constituents in your State. Many of 
you know your State commissioners and all of us have worked hard, not just at our 
day  jobs,  but  to  be  honest  brokers  on  how  national  policies  impact  each  of  our 
States. 

I know it is difficult to sort through the myriad of policy questions Congress rou-
tinely  faces,  but  I  would  respectfully  suggest  that  a  continuing  partnership  with 
State-level colleagues that share your interests is key. And it’s a key that both Con-
gress  and  various  Federal  agencies  have  employed  repeatedly  and  successfully  in 
the past to address difficult policy issues.1 Certainly seeking the opinions of similarly 
situated,  non-biased  experts  from  your  respective  States  can  only  assist  you  in  ad-
dressing  these  problems.  That’s  only  one  of  the  reasons  why  we  commend  you  and 
the committee for holding this hearing on number portability—which ultimately pro-
tects  competition  and  area  codes  from  premature  exhaust—both  goals  States  share 
with  Congress  and  the  Federal  Communications  Commission.  We  particularly  ap-
preciate your setting aside time to hear from your ‘‘beyond the Beltway’’ colleagues. 
An Efficient Porting Process is Critical to Competition 

An efficient Number Portability process is critical to both efforts to enhance inter-
modal  and  intramodal  competition  and  also  NARUC’s  State  member  efforts  to  con-
strain State-specific area code exhaust. There is at least one open and pending Fed-
eral Communications Commission proceeding on this issue. 

Even  if  Congress  is  unable  to  move  legislation  on  this  issue,  we  recognize  that 
this  hearing  alone  will  undoubtedly  provide  additional  impetus  for  FCC  action  in 
that and any related dockets. 
NARUC has been an Early and Persistent Advocate for Portability 

In  1996,  Congress  added  47  U.S.C.  § 251(b)(2)  to  the  Communications  Act.  That 
section  requires  all  local  exchange  carriers  (‘‘LECs’’)  to  offer  number  portability  in 
compliance  with  FCC  rules.  That  same  year,  the  Commission  determined  that  the 
public interest would be served by extending the portability requirement to wireless 
carriers  as  well  as  the  incumbent  LECs.2 NARUC  strongly  supported  this  FCC  ini-
tiative.  We  filed  numerous  pleadings  agreeing  with  the  FCC’s  assessment  that  the 
competition  resulting  from  portability  ‘‘should  foster  lower  local  telephone  prices 
and,  consequently,  stimulate  demand  for  telecommunications  services  and  increase 
economic growth.’’ 3 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

18 

Some Porting Issues Require Immediate Attention 

As this hearing suggests, there are some outstanding issues that need resolution. 
Most  recently,  on  January  9,  2007,  the  FCC  noticed  for  comment  a  December  20, 
2006, T-Mobile USA, Inc. (‘‘T-Mobile’’), and Sprint Nextel Corporation (‘‘Sprint’’) Pe-
tition for Declaratory Ruling asking the FCC to end an ongoing controversy regard-
ing  the  Commission’s  requirement  that  only  ‘‘necessary’’  validation  procedures  be 
utilized  in  the  porting  process.  The  Petitioners,  citing  unwarranted  delays  in  the 
process, seek a ruling ‘‘. . . that all carriers obligated to provide number portability 
may not obstruct or delay the porting process by demanding from the porting-in car-
rier  information  in  excess  of  the  minimum  information  needed  to  validate  the  re-
questing customer.’’ 

While portability generally has worked well to stave off exhaust and promote com-
petition,  some  concerns  raised  by  that  petition  highlight  some  problems  with  the 
current  process  and  seem  particularly  relevant  to  the  draft  legislation  we  under-
stand may be introduced on this issue. 
NARUC Endorses Uniform Simple Porting Process 

On  February  21,  2007,  NARUC  responded  to  the  notice  by  passing  a  resolution 
addressing the Sprint-T-Mobile proceeding that specifically endorses a porting proc-
ess  that  is  uniform  throughout  the  industry  and  relatively  simple  to  implement.  A 
copy  of  that  resolution  is  submitted  with  my  testimony.  Several  individual  NARUC 
members, including the California, Nebraska, and Iowa commissions also filed com-
ments  encouraging  the  FCC  to  establish  ‘‘. . .  a  simple  and  uniform  porting  proc-
ess.’’ 
The Time Frame for Porting 

The ability of any carrier to effectively ‘‘port in’’ a customer is directly tied to the 
practices of the carrier that will be ‘‘porting out’’ the customer. Sprint and T-Mobile 
have  told  the  FCC  that  some  carriers  have  adopted  practices  which  complicate  and 
prolong  the  ‘‘porting  out’’  process,  thus  hindering  the  effectiveness  of  competition. 
They  point  out  that  these  practices,  in  fact,  delay  a  competitor’s  ability  to  activate 
the number often for weeks or months ‘‘. . . resulting in a frustrating customer ex-
perience,  an  unnecessarily  high  port  cancellation  rate,  and  ultimately,  a  barrier  to 
competition.’’ 

Two  undisputed  facts  from  the  T-Mobile-Sprint  petition  suggest  some  immediate 

action is warranted with respect to at least LEC porting procedures. 

First, T-Mobile-Sprint argue that the inefficiency of the incumbent LEC validation 
process  is  starkly  highlighted  when  it  is  compared  to  the  intramodal  wireless 
porting  mechanism  in  use  today.  For  simple  wireless-to-wireless  ports,  according  to 
these  carriers,  numbers  are  usually  ported  in  a  matter  of  hours  with  a  nominal 
amount of information exchanged by the carriers. In such ports, wireless consumers 
are  generally  unable  to  detect  any  difference  between  changing  providers  with 
porting and changing carriers without porting. 
The Need for a Uniform Process 

The second, pointed out later in the petition, is the fact that wireless carriers ini-
tially required nine data fields to port a customer, then, because that made the proc-
ess  less  efficient  and  the  additional  fields  were  not  needed  to  protect  customers’ 
choices, cut it to four, then three, data fields. 

This  is  clear  evidence  that  a  less  burdensome  and  uniform  process  can  work 

quickly to protect consumers and competition in a commercial environment. 

T-Mobile and Sprint also told the FCC that some LECs are insisting on ‘‘outdated 
and  unnecessarily  arduous  procedures,  such  as  completion  of  port  request  forms 
with more than 100 data fields.’’ To back the allegation, they attached to their filing 
a  sample  form  with  more  than  100  data  fields,  including  fields  requiring  input  of 
‘‘additional  engineering,’’  ‘‘additional  forms,’’  ‘‘additional  labor,’’  and  ‘‘account  re-
grade.’’ 

It  is  difficult  to  understand  how  this  much  information  could  be  required  to  port 
a customer from one carrier to another. If these allegations are true, they certainly 
support  their  argument  that  some  LECs  are  imposing  onerous  and  burdensome 
porting requirements simply to slow their churn rates by rendering the porting proc-
ess complicated and time-consuming. 

The  churn  statistics  cited  in  that  proceeding  seem  to  bear  this  out.  They  point 
out  that  while  the  consumer  cancellation  rate  for  intramodal  (i.e.,  wireless-to-wire-
less)  ports  is  about  5  percent,  the  cancellation  rate  for  intermodal  ports  is  approxi-
mately 30 percent. They also argue that onerous non-standard ILEC validation pro-
cedures are the root cause for the disparity in rates. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

19 

NARUC  has  taken  the  position  that,  at  a  minimum,  the  FCC  must  investigate 
to see if a more streamlined process, like the one that works in the wireless-to-wire-
less environment can work in intermodel ports. 

The petition before the FCC also presents a simple solution for the Commission’s 
consideration  and  suggests  no  new  rules  are  needed.  According  to  the  T-Mobile- 
Sprint  Petition,  the  FCC  ‘‘. . .  need  only  further  clarify  that  porting-out  carriers 
may  not  demand  information  from  requesting  providers  beyond  that  required  to 
validate  the  customer  request  and  accomplish  the  port.’’  The  Petition  suggests, 
based  on  the  practices  of  the  wireless  industry,  that  LECs,  should  validate  ports 
using  no  more  than  four  customer  validation  fields,  limiting  the  validation  to  those 
fields ‘‘necessary’’ to the process. 
Conclusion 

NARUC has urged the FCC to immediately act to prohibit onerous and non-stand-
ard  porting  practices  as  anti-competitive  and  anti-consumer.  The  statistics  on 
porting cited in this open docket suggest both the Commission’s and Congress’s pri-
mary  purpose  in  establishing  portability  obligations  is  being  frustrated.  Something 
must be causing almost a third of customers to cancel their wireline-to-wireless ports. 
We  have  urged  the  Commission  to,  at  a  minimum,  clarify  its  2003  ruling  that  car-
riers  may  not  impose  ‘‘restrictions  on  porting  beyond  necessary  validation  proce-
dures’’  and,  while  we  took  no  specific  stance  on  the  T-Mobile-Sprint  specific  pro-
posal, we also urged the FCC to establish a uniform industry porting process to as-
sure  that  ALL  service  providers  comply  with  uniform  industry  porting  guidelines 
and work cooperatively with other carriers in resolving disputes. We hope Congress’ 
interest in this issue will, at a minimum, provide additional information and incen-
tives for FCC action. 

Thanks again for the opportunity to testify. I look forward to your questions. 

Endnotes 

1 Indeed, Congress has frequently recognized in legislation the importance of Fed-
eral Agencies working in tandem with NARUC member commissions. See 47 U.S.C. 
§ 410(c)  (1971)  (NARUC  nominates  members  to  FCC  Joint  Federal-State  Boards 
which consider universal service, separations, and related concerns and provide for-
mal  recommendations  that  the  FCC  must  act  upon);  Cf.  47  U.S.C.  § 254  (1996)  (de-
scribing  functions  of  the  Joint  Federal-State  Board  on  Universal  Service).  Cf. 
NARUC, et al. v. ICC, 41 F.3d 721 (D.C. Cir 1994) (where the Court explains ‘‘. . . 
Carriers,  to  get  the  cards,  applied  to  . . .  (NARUC),  an  interstate  umbrella  organi-
zation that, as envisioned by Congress, played a role in drafting the regulations that 
the  ICC  issued  to  create  the  ‘‘bingo  card’’  system.)  There  are  also  numerous  exam-
ples  of  successful  collaborations  between  the  Federal  Communications  Commission 
(FCC)  and  NARUC’s  members  on  slamming,  truth-in-billing,  operator  service  re-
quirements, telemarketing, customer privacy/Caller ID issues, and related consumer 
protection  issues.  Most  reveal  the  same  key  elements.  NARUC’s  July  2005  Resolu-
tion Supporting FCC Slamming Rules provides a perfect case study illustrating the 
practical  benefits  of  leveraged/more  effective  enforcement  and  reduced  consumer 
confusion  inherent  in  this  cooperative  approach.  That  CC  Docket  No.  97–129  pro-
ceeding  was  premised  on  specific  authority  in  47  U.S.C.  § 258  (1996).  In  its  First 
Order on Reconsideration (FCC 00–135), the FCC recognized States should have the 
ability,  if  they  choose,  to  mediate  slamming  complaints  received  from  consumers 
within  that  State.  It  also  acknowledged  individual  States  have  unique  processes, 
procedures and rules regarding slamming complaints. Pursuant to the revised rules, 
States are now able to ‘‘opt-in’’ to become the primary forums for administering the 
slamming  liability  rules  and  resolving  consumer’s  slamming  complaints.  Although 
Congress  limited  the  FCC’s  flexibility  somewhat,  the  agency  did  not  take  a  ‘‘cookie 
cutter’’  approach  to  slamming  regulations.  Rather  the  FCC  has  provided  needed 
flexibility  to  the  States  to  address  unique  fraudulent  activities  by  establishing  the 
regulatory floor and allowing the States to establish more stringent rules or the reg-
ulatory  ceiling—particularly  in  the  area  of  enhanced  penalties.  Thirty-seven  States 
opted-in  to  the  FCC’s  approach.  There  is  no  question  oversight  of  slamming  issues 
has been enhanced through collaborative federalism as evidenced by: (i) more exten-
sive  information  sharing  on  market  practices  and  trends,  (ii)  decreases  in  com-
plaints,  (iii)  better  coordinated  enforcement  efforts,  and  (iv)  the  creation  of  a  ‘‘com-
mon  front’’  in  opposition  to  abusive  practices  affecting  consumers  of  telecommuni-
cations  services  established  via  the  FCC’s  actions.  Any  other  framework  effectively 
removes cops from the beat. 

2 See  Telephone  Number  Portability,  First  Report  and  Order  and  Further  Notice 

of Proposed Rulemaking, 11 FCC Rcd 8352 ¶ 153 (1996) (‘‘First Porting Order’’). 

3 First Porting Order ¶ 30. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

20 

4 ‘‘Pleading  Cycle  Established  for  Comments  on  T-Mobile  USA,  Inc.  and  Sprint 
Nextel Corporation’s Petition for Declaratory Ruling Regarding Number Portability’’, 
DA  07–39,  (Jan.  9,  2007)  Available  online  at:  http://hraunfoss.fcc.gov/edocsl 
public/attachmatch/DA-07-39A1.doc. 

APPENDIX 

FEBRUARY 21, 2007 RESOLUTION CONCERNING LOCAL NUMBER PORTABILITY 

WHEREAS,  The  National  Association  of  Regulatory  Utility  Commissioners 
(‘‘NARUC’’) has strongly supported the implementation of Local Number Portability 
(LNP) as an important vehicle for consumer choice; and 

WHEREAS,  LNP  provides  the  opportunity  for  consumers  to  easily  move  service 

between LNP-capable providers while retaining their telephone number; and 

WHEREAS,  Competition  in  all  voice  services  has  increased  the  need  for  LNP  to 
realize  customer  choice  between  service  providers;  and  therefore  porting  of  tele-
phone  numbers  used  by  all  carriers,  including  LECs,  CLECs,  wireless  carriers  and 
VoIP service providers should comply with uniform industry porting guidelines; and 
WHEREAS,  NARUC  supports  policies  which  encourage  the  continued  advance-
ment of competition in telecommunications markets and the ability of consumers to 
take  their  telephone  number  with  them  when  they  opt  for  a  new  or  different  pro-
vider’s products and services regardless of the type of service; and 

WHEREAS, A simpler and more convenient process of porting numbers should be 
considered  for  adoption  as  the  uniform  industry  porting  process  in  order  to  accom-
modate  further  consumer  ease,  increase  the  rate  of  successful  port  completions  and 
facilitate the further advancement of competition; and 

WHEREAS, Various technical industry groups and bodies responsible for the set-
ting  of  industry  standards,  such  as  the  Alliance  for  Telecommunications  Industry 
Solutions  (ATIS),  have  been  unable  to  resolve  diverse  order  processing  formats  be-
tween providers for number porting; and 

WHEREAS,  The  North  American  Numbering  Council  (NANC)  has  examined  the 
wireless  number  portability  issues  on  several  occasions  over  the  past  8  years,  most 
recently,  in  response  to  a  request  from  the  FCC,  including  forming  an  Intermodal 
Porting  Issue  Management  Group  (IMG)  that  produced  a  report  and  recommenda-
tion  in  May  2004  setting  forth  a  streamlined  confirmation  and  activation  process; 
however, its effective implementation has been hindered by the requirement to sub-
mit an ‘‘error-free’’ port request; and 

WHEREAS, The ATIS Ordering and Billing Forum (OBF) has been unable to de-
velop a more efficient and uniform process for porting between wireline and wireless 
providers  through  their  approval  process  since  assignment  of  the  issue  in  July  of 
2005; and 

WHEREAS,  The  challenges  regarding  number  portability  for  VoIP  service  pro-
viders  have  become  increasingly  common  recently  and  have  been  raised  before  a 
number  of  bodies  including  State  commissions,  both  for  the  porting  in  of  a  number 
to a VoIP provider and the porting out of a number from a VoIP provider; and 

WHEREAS,  The  adoption  of  a  simple  and  uniform  industry  porting  process  will 
facilitate  consumer  choice  by  improving  customers’  ability  to  switch  carriers  when 
desired, as well as creating a uniform understanding, by all parties, of the steps re-
quired to port numbers; and 

WHEREAS,  There  is  pending  before  the  Federal  Communications  Commission 
(‘‘FCC’’),  in  Docket  CC  95–116,  a  Petition  for  Declaratory  Ruling  regarding  LNP 
seeking  clarification  that  carriers  obligated  to  provide  number  portability  may  not 
obstruct or delay the porting process by demanding information from requesting car-
riers beyond that required to validate the customer request and accomplish the port 
(‘‘Portability Petition’’); now, therefore, be it 

RESOLVED,  That  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  National  Association  of  Regu-
latory  Utility  Commissioners  convened  in  its  2007  Winter  Meetings  in  Washington, 
D.C. expresses its support for the adoption of a simple and uniform industry porting 
process; and be it further 

RESOLVED, That NARUC staff shall file comments with the FCC in CC 95–116, 
consistent with this resolution, encouraging the FCC to establish a uniform industry 
porting process; and be it further 

RESOLVED,  That  NARUC  also  conveys  its  concerns  to  the  FCC  in  the  Number 
Portability  Docket  regarding  the  challenges  created  by  having  different  types  of 
service  providers  porting  numbers  to  each  other,  and  the  need  for  all  service  pro-
viders to comply with uniform industry porting guidelines and to work cooperatively 
with other carriers in resolving disputes. 
Sponsored by the Committees on Telecommunications and Consumer Affairs. 
Adopted by the NARUC Board of Directors, February 21, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

21 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. All right, thank you very much, Mr. Clark. With-
out  objection,  my  opening  statement  will  be  made  part  of  the 
record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
More  than  a  decade  ago,  Congress  sought  to  open  our  communications  markets 
to  competition.  By  removing  barriers  that  impaired  the  ability  of  new  entrants  to 
compete, we sought to usher in a new era of pro-consumer telecommunications com-
petition. 

Number  portability  was  one  of  these  barriers.  Without  it,  consumers  would  have 
been required to switch their telephone number whenever they switched their serv-
ice provider. 

To  avoid  this  complication,  Congress  required  the  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission  (FCC)  to  implement  number  portability.  As  a  result,  consumers  can  take 
their  phone  number  with  them  without  the  hassle,  loss  of  identity,  and  cost  that 
would otherwise come with changing numbers when changing providers. 

New  forms  of  competition  like  wireless  and  Voice-over-IP  services  have  predict-
ably  led  to  new  portability  challenges.  These  services  raise  important,  and  some-
times  technically  difficult  questions  about  how  we  might  streamline  the  porting 
process and provide consumers with a swift and glitch-free transition between serv-
ice providers. 

Today’s hearing allows us to explore these issues and to get some answers. It also 
allows  us  to  discuss  legislation  recently  introduced  by  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  and 
myself that takes a small, yet important, step in directing the Commission to estab-
lish porting performance standards that will promote competition and make it easi-
er for consumers to switch services. 

I look forward to working on this issue and to hearing from today’s witnesses. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Vice Chairman? 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I  want  to  know,  Mr.  Schremp,  how  many  of  these  port  orders 
would be normal to come per day in an organization such as yours? 
Mr.  SCHREMP.  About  three-quarters  of  our  new  customers  bring 
their  phone  number  with  them.  So,  the  vast  majority  of  our  trans-
actions  are  port-based  orders,  so  that  we  go  through  the  porting 
process.  So,  on  a  daily  basis,  it’s  two  or  three  thousand,  and  cer-
tainly growing as we expand our business. 

Senator STEVENS. Now, there’s an assumption here in the indus-
try that the cost should be absorbed by the entity that’s losing the 
customer, is that right? 

Mr.  SCHREMP.  Well,  my  understanding  of  the  basis  is  that  it  ac-
tually  be  borne  by  the  end-user  consumer,  and  that  it  be  part  of 
the tariff charges that many consumers have incurred for 10 years 
now,  so  when  number  portability  first  came  about  in  the,  sort  of, 
mid-  to  late  nineties,  that  a  lot  of  those  costs  were  borne  by  the 
consumer, and continue to be. 

Senator STEVENS. That’s the consumers of the entity that’s losing 

the customer, right? 

Mr.  SCHREMP.  That  would  be  the  case  in  terms  of  the  majority 
of the customer base that continues to be with the incumbent tele-
phone, that’s true. 

In our case, we certainly do port-out transactions as well, and we 

assess no fees to other parties. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  let  me  ask  all  of  you,  if  the  customers 
are moving to a new entity, and the income is going to go with that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

22 

customer,  what’s  the  rationale  for  leaving  the  costs  of  this  porting 
system on the backs of the losing carrier? 

Anyone  want  to  comment  on  that?  It  seems  to  me,  there’s  a  dis-
incentive here to the losing carrier to move as fast as the customer 
wants, because they’re going to have to pay the cost. The faster you 
move—I assume—the greater the cost. Am I wrong? 

Mr.  SCHREMP.  From  my  perspective,  the  greater  issue  is  that 
there  are  no  market  incentives,  regardless  of  the  administrative 
costs of completing the port. There are—in the wireline-to-wireline 
world,  there  are  no  market  incentives  for  the  incumbent  providers 
to  act  in  an  efficient  mode.  The  incumbent  carriers—pretty  much 
across the board—have been losing 6 to 7 percent of their wireline 
customers on an annual basis. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Does  the  acquiring  carrier  have  any  costs  at 

all to portability? 

Mr. SCHREMP. Sure we do, we absolutely do. 
Senator STEVENS. What is that? 
Mr.  SCHREMP.  So,  those  costs  are  the  administrative  costs  of 
populating  these  forms,  the  administrative  costs  of  having—you 
know,  in  our  case—you  know,  literally  dozens  of  people  that  do 
nothing but port transactions. 

Senator STEVENS. Any different than taking on a new customer? 
Mr.  SCHREMP.  Certainly  more  expensive  for  us  to  take  on  a  new 
customer  where  they  port  their  number.  And,  the  difference  is—— 
Senator  STEVENS.  But,  I  mean,  is  it—suppose  it’s  just  a  brand- 
new  customer.  Someone  moves  into  the  country,  they  want  a  tele-
phone service. Now, is that going to cost you more or less than hav-
ing a current customer from another entity ask you to come to your 
service. 

Mr. SCHREMP. Absolutely costs us less. So, in the case that we’re 
porting  the  customer’s  phone  number,  our  costs  are  certainly  $20, 
$30, $40 higher to complete the port transaction. That’s sort of the 
hard cost associated with the head count, the human resources re-
quired to—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  Gentlemen,  can  any  of  you  tell  us,  what’s  the 
relative cost between the entity that’s losing the customer, and the 
entity that’s gaining the customer? 

Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  I  can’t  answer  that  now,  but  I  could  get 
you  some  information  for  the  record  on  that,  on  what  it  costs  us 
to port. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  our  bill  is  trying  to  make  it  fair,  but 
make  it  customer-friendly,  consumer-friendly,  and  saying  it  must 
be done as quickly as possible. Now, can that be achieved? And, do 
we need this bill to achieve it? 

Mr. BANKS. Well, I think you’re right, Senator, to raise the issue 
of the, sort of, a cost-benefit analysis. That there are costs to num-
ber porting, and there are benefits. The benefits are—we don’t un-
derstand the benefits of moving it from 4 days, which is the current 
deadline, to 3 days or 2 days. 

But, when NANC spent a lot of time on this, they attached some 
cost  estimates,  to  different  solutions  to  speeding  up  wireline 
porting, and none of the solutions would move us all the way to the 
wireless  intervals.  Some  would  move  us  closer,  but  could  cost  bil-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

23 

lions of dollars, and I think you raise a very good point that, those 
billions of dollars will have to be paid by somebody. 

Senator STEVENS. Mr. Clark, you’re, I understand, the Chairman 
of  the  Telecommunications  Committee.  Has  that  Committee  ana-
lyzed this problem, in terms of balance of cost of this porting trans-
action? 

Mr.  CLARK.  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  I’m  not  aware  that  our  Com-
mittee  has  done  that,  most  of  that  would  rest  with  either  the 
NANC, or the ATIS industry board. 

However,  I  think  your  question  raises  a  valid  point,  which  is, 
when LNP was first set up, recall that the ILECs were allowed, for 
5  years,  to  recover  the  cost  of  implementing  the  setup  of  that  pro-
gram.  So,  I  think  there  was  a  recognition  that  there  is  a  cost  to 
initially set it up. 

I  think  it’s  very  worthy  of  study  to  decide,  if  there  are  ongoing 
administrative  costs  that  need  to  be  recovered,  and  I  think 
NARUC’s  position  would  be,  if  that’s  a  root  cause,  if  that’s  one  of 
the  barriers  to  getting  effective  porting  taken  care  of,  then  we 
ought to find some way to knock down that barrier. 

Senator STEVENS. But if I leave that entity, and ask to move my 
number  to  a  new  wireless  service—if  I  leave  a  wire  service  to  go 
to  a  wireless  service,  I  understand  it  takes  two  and  a  half  hours 
to go to the wireline service, it takes 4 days on the wireline service. 
Now, why is that? 

Mr.  CLARK.  And  that’s  what  we’re  hearing,  as  well,  and  that’s 
what  was  really  the  impetus  for  our  resolution,  which  is  that—we 
don’t  know  what  it  is,  yet,  but  there  clearly  is  something  wrong. 
I mean, if wireless-to-wireless ports can happen so quickly, we ask, 
why  cannot  wireline-to-wireless  ports  happen  with  the  same  type 
of  speed?  And  I  don’t  think  we  have  the  answer  to  that  today. 
But—— 

Senator STEVENS. Is there uniformity within the industry of how 

it’s done? 

Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  On  the  wireless  side  there  is,  Senator. 
And that is part of our concern. We recognize and understand that 
there is going to be a cost that will be a portion of, or go along with 
streamlining the wireline-to-wireless process. And as Commissioner 
Clark  suggested,  there  was  a  cost-recovery  mechanism  in  place  for 
the local exchange carriers when this requirement was initially put 
in, by the Committee, and by Congress. 

But what we question is why can a wireless-to-wireless port hap-
pen  in  two  and  a  half  hours,  using  three  or  four  fields,  when  a 
wireline-to-wireless  happens  in  a  less  effective  manner,  taking  up 
to  4  days  or  beyond,  involving,  at  times,  20,  30,  50  or  more  fields. 
Senator STEVENS. Mr. Schremp, Mr. Banks—I think, we want to 
be  fair  in  what  we’re  mandating,  but  it  appears  to  me  that  as— 
wireless is the new game in town—there are going to be more con-
sumers  migrating  from  wireline  service  to  wireless,  than  there  is 
from  wireless-to-wireless,  or  from  wireless  back  to  the  wireline. 
Why  should  the  customers  that  remain  on  the  telephone  system, 
the wireline system, bear the cost of portability to the wireless sys-
tem? 

Mr.  BANKS.  I  think  that’s  a  reasonable  question.  And,  I  would 
also  add  that  there  are—when  we  compare  the  2  hours,  to  the  4 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

24 

days it takes on the wireline side, that is exactly what NANC spent 
thousands  of  hours  understanding  and  making  recommendations 
about. And it’s hard to sum up very quickly why it takes longer on 
the  wireline  side,  but  it’s  a  function  of  the  fact  that  wireline  net-
works  are  different,  and  incumbents  have  said  this,  and  competi-
tive  carriers  say  this—we  both  say  this—it’s  different,  we  have 
loops  we  have  to  keep  track  of,  we  have  a  number  of  things  we 
have  to  keep  track  of,  we  have  networks  that  have  been  in  place 
for a long time. 

And,  finally,  I  think  all  our  companies  would  prefer  faster,  and 
faster  is  good,  but  getting  it  right  is  better.  And  if  we  mess  up  for 
a  wireline  customer  that  has  one  line  at  their  house,  and  the  port 
is done incorrectly, so the wrong person loses service, that’s a very 
bad thing. And, it’s very important to avoid that. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Can  this  be  automated  between  wireline  to 
wireless?  It  looks  like  it  is  automated  wireless-to-wireless.  Can  it 
be automated, wireline to wireless? 

Mr.  BANKS.  In  fact,  the  processes  are  automated  on  the  wireline 
side  at  the  larger  companies,  their  semi-automated  at  some  of  the 
medium-sized  companies,  and  at  the  smaller  companies,  they  tend 
to be completely manual. 

Senator STEVENS. So, by definition, the smaller the company, the 

greater the cost if you’re going to lose a customer? 

Mr. BANKS. More or less. 
Senator STEVENS. Mr. Chairman, I’m a little worried about what 
we’re  doing  in  terms—is  our  bill  really,  in  the  opinion  of  the  four 
of you, is it necessary in order to bring about action from the FCC? 
Mr.  Schremp?  Let’s  just  go  by—I’m  going  to  have  to  give  up  here 
in a minute. 

Mr. SCHREMP. From my perspective, I think one of the key points 
for  Charter,  is  not  so  much  that  we  need  any  new  technology  or 
any new infrastructure that doesn’t exist. What we’re really looking 
for is, sort of, reinforcement and validation of the 4-day rule. 

We  have  260  porting  partners,  we  call  them,  folks  that  we  work 
with  to  either  port  numbers  in  or  port  numbers  out.  Fully  half  of 
which, their published procedures are in violation of the 4-days. 

We  can  make  4  days  work.  We’re  not  asking  for  any  significant 
new investment or infrastructure, at least at this point in time. We 
think  we  can  make  4  days  work,  but  in  many,  many  cases  today 
it  doesn’t.  Including  with  very  large  telcos.  There  are  folks  like 
Century  Tel,  and  TDS  and  Citizens,  who—their  published  proc-
esses,  be  they  either  manual  or  automated—are  in  violation  of  the 
four-day rule. 

We’re a fairly small telco. You know, we have 600,000 customers, 
so in the grand scheme of telecommunications companies for phone, 
we’re fairly small. We’re not automated. And we abide by the 4-day 
rule without any problem whatsoever. And the port—— 
Senator STEVENS. Can you do it shorter than 4 days? 
Mr. SCHREMP. We absolutely can. The port-out process for us—— 
Senator STEVENS. Does it increase your cost? 
Mr.  SCHREMP.  To  a  degree  it  does,  to  deal  with,  sort  of,  peaks 
and  valleys  in  terms  of,  of  volume,  perhaps.  You  know,  any  time 
you compress a process. But it takes us 2 to 3 minutes. 

Senator STEVENS. I’ve got to keep going. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

25 

Mr. Banks? 
Mr. BANKS. I think that this bill, and the discussion we’re having 
about  the  porting  process  are  helpful  for  the  FCC,  for  NANC,  for 
the  industry  to  renew  their  focus  on  this  issue,  and  to  work  to-
gether in NANC in the Ordering and Billing Forum to improve the 
processes. 

Senator STEVENS. Mr. Clark, the FCC has had it before the Com-
mission  for  3  years,  as  I  understand  it,  and  has  not  acted.  Do  you 
think we have to have this bill? 

Mr.  CLARK.  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  I  think  in  our  opinion  it  would 
be  necessary,  to  the  extent  necessary  to  get  the  FCC  to  act,  well, 
they’ve got the authority they need. Does this hearing and the bill, 
perhaps, speed up a process that, perhaps, has been too slow at the 
FCC? I think we would agree with that. 

Senator STEVENS. What do you think, Mr. Guttman-McCabe? 
Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  Senator,  I  would  say,  I  hope  that  this 
legislation is not necessary. The Commission has before it a recent 
filing  by  Sprint  and  T-Mobile  of  December  of  2006,  and  we  hope 
that they will act quickly on that. We are concerned by some of the 
suggestions  by  Mr.  Banks  and  others  that  this  is  properly  housed 
in  the  NANC  or  in  the  ATIS  Ordering  and  Billing  Forum,  because 
it’s been there since 2004, and that’s 3 years. So, hopefully it’s not 
necessary. 

Senator  STEVENS.  OK,  last  question  for  this  time—the  current 
legislation doesn’t cover Internet voice services in the port area. Do 
you think we need this bill so it will be covered? 

Any of you? 
Mr. SCHREMP. I believe there’s value in clarifying that VoIP pro-
viders  are,  in  fact,  mandated  to  support  number  portability,  as  we 
put  in  some  of  our  filings  with  the  FCC.  Vonage  ports  have  taken 
as long as 3 weeks in many cases, and it has been a fairly common 
experience. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’m  sorry  to  take  so  long,  I’ll 
yield the floor. But, I do think there must be cost differences in the 
way  this  is  done,  and  I  think  we  should  have  from  you  all,  what 
are  the  differences,  and  what  are  the—how  do  they  vary  in  terms 
of  wireless-to-wireless,  wireless-to-wireline,  and  wireline-to-wire-
less,  in  terms  of  the  cost  differences.  Could  you  give  us  that  infor-
mation? 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you, your questions were very important, 

so you could have continued if you wanted it. 

Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Thank you to our witnesses. I was listening to this remembering 
back  to  when  I  worked  in  this  area  as  a  private  lawyer  rep-
resenting  MCI  and  other  companies  back  in  the  nineties,  and  this 
was right when the Telecom Act passed, and I remembered we had 
hearings  about  area  codes,  and  very  heated  discussions  about 
whether  people  would  remember  new  area  codes  and  that  they 
wanted  to  have  the  same  one  as  their  neighbors,  and  I  remember 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

26 

the discussion would always say, ‘‘But in the future, we’re going to 
have number portability, and it won’t matter.’’ And, so here we are. 
And I do believe that for consumers to fully benefit from the com-
petitive  promises  of  the  1996  Telecom  Act,  we  need  to  ensure  that 
the  telecom  industry  is  operating  under  an  efficient  and  fair  num-
ber portability system. After all, the promise of that landmark leg-
islation  can  only  be  realized  if  consumers  are  able  to  take  advan-
tage of the competitive options that are available to them. 

So,  I  just  had  a  few  questions  along  those  lines  to  follow  up  on 
some  of  the  questions  that  Senator  Stevens  was  asking.  And  I 
guess the first question is for you, Mr. Banks, is you talked about— 
and there was a line of questioning about how, that you’ve received 
very  few  consumer  complaints,  I  think  in  your  prepared  testimony 
you  said  9  porting  complaints  out  of  approximately  900,000.  Yet,  I 
think that where we were going here, was that for some of the com-
panies,  it’s  much  more  difficult  to  do  that.  And,  could  you  talk 
about  where  the  complaints  are,  and  where  the  problems  are,  and 
is it solely based on the size of the company? 

Mr.  BANKS.  So,  I  think  that  there’s  no  simple  answer  to  your 
question, in that there is a lot of performance data that’s submitted 
to  state  commissions  from  the  larger  companies  that  look  at,  sort 
of,  various  aspects  of  ordering  and  porting.  So  there  are  monthly 
reports to state commissions for the larger carriers. 

The  smaller  carriers—from  the  data  we  have  gotten,  which  is, 
certainly  doesn’t  cover  all  of  them—shows  that,  for  the  most  part 
they  work  their  processes  correctly,  and  get  very  few  complaints. 
So,  I  think  there  are  some  ships  passing  in  the  night  about  ex-
actly how many complaints are there, and how many intervals are 
missed, and who’s doing it. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Clark, do you have anything along this 
line  that  you’d  like  to  add?  Just  as  we’ve  discussed,  there’s  such  a 
difference between the portability between wireless-to-wireless, and 
wireline-to-wireless. 

Mr. CLARK. Sure, and Senator, let me say, it’s an honor to testify 
before  you.  My  old  legislative  district  in  Fargo  bordered  the  Red 
River, so we in eastern North Dakota sort of adopted most of north-
west Minnesota as honorary North Dakotans. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And we, too. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. CLARK. Let me say that, I think that your state commissions 
would  have  better  information,  as  Mr.  Banks  suggested,  for  those 
larger  carriers.  And  a  good  part  of  the  reason  is  because  the  271 
process,  most  States,  as  part  of  that  approval  process,  tracked  the 
manner  in  which  new  customers,  or  ports  are  taken.  Things  like 
that. So, I think you, probably are able to get pretty good informa-
tion on most of the former Bell companies. 

It  would  be  more  difficult  for  everyone  but  the  RBOCs,  because 
I  don’t  know  that  that  information  would  be  as  readily  available. 
I  know  in  talking  with  the  smaller  carriers  in  our  State,  they  had 
a  great  deal  of  concern  about  implementing  local  number  port-
ability,  because  of  the  cost-benefit  that  they,  perhaps,  saw.  And 
most of them have indicated that they have yet to process any local 
number  portability  cases,  although  they  indicate  they  have  the  ca-
pability to do so. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

27 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  How  does  the  demand  differ  from,  though, 
rural  areas  to  metropolitan  areas  across  the  country  for  the  inter-
modal number porting? 

Mr.  CLARK.  Senator,  I  think  the  answer  is  probably  that  you’re 
going  to  see  most  of  it  in  the  urban  areas,  and  the  reason  is  be-
cause  as  you  get  into  more  rural  areas—although  it’s  not  univer-
sally true—certainly wireless coverage tends to be a little bit more 
spotty. So that, the reason—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. I guess I just noticed that on my trip home. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  CLARK.  So,  folks  in  rural  areas  oftentimes,  the  rationale  be-
hind getting a wireless phone is often for the mobility aspect, being 
able  to  have  some  safety  on  the  highways  when  they  travel  long 
distances,  things  like  that,  whereas  actually  cutting  the  cord  may 
not  be  as  realistic  an  option  for  them,  because,  perhaps,  their  in- 
home wireless penetration isn’t as good as you might have in more 
urban areas. I think that’s probably a lot of what’s driving the rea-
son  that  the  impetus  for  wireline-to-wireless  ports  seems  to  be  in 
the  more  urban  areas,  where  there  just  is  much  heavier  wireless 
coverage. And they tend to be covered by the RBOCs. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Schremp,  I  know  your  company  has 
business  in  Minnesota,  and  employees  in  Minnesota,  and  I  just 
wondered  from  your  perspective,  how  long  do  you  believe  that  po-
tential  customers  have  to  wait  for  your  service,  before  they’re 
transferred? 

Mr.  SCHREMP.  Our  average  order  to  install  interval  is  in  the 
range  of  10  to  12  days  for  a  ported  number,  which  is  significantly 
longer than our install interval for other types of services. And one 
of the things that becomes particularly challenging for us is that— 
as you probably see in advertising and so forth across the cable in-
dustry—you know, the real push is around the ‘‘bundle’’ of services. 
So,  video  programming,  high-speed  Internet  access,  and  telephone. 
And, there are certainly many scenarios where, because of delays 
in  the  porting  process,  we’re  forced  to  go  out,  and  the  consumer  is 
forced  to  endure,  two  separate  installations;  go  out  and  install 
video  service  and  high-speed  Internet  service,  and  then  wait  for 
number  porting  to  occur  to  come  back  and  install  the  telephone 
service. So, it creates, sort of, an additional layer of complexity for 
us, above and beyond other issues that may occur, solely within the 
phone product. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  And  how  about  the  number  of  people  that 
cancel their service, because it just takes too long to transfer? And, 
do you have Minnesota-specific numbers on that? 

Mr.  SCHREMP.  I  don’t  have  Minnesota-specific  numbers,  I  could 

certainly obtain them for you and share them. 

The real challenge that we have, is when an order is rejected by 
what we call, the donor telco, the portee, I guess is the way to look 
at it—and that rejection rate is about 15 percent, so 150 to 300 per 
day.  The  challenge  in  almost  every  case,  once  an  order  is  rejected, 
is that our original install date that we’ve negotiated with the cus-
tomer,  and  arranged  with  the  customer,  is  no  longer  valid.  So,  we 
have  to  get  back  in  touch  with  that  customer—they  may  or  may 
not have to re-plan their schedule, and so forth. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

28 

And so, the cancellation rate is particularly high within those 15 
percent that have an order rejected in the initial go-round. And, it 
becomes  a  snowball  effect  of  negotiating  a  new  installation  date, 
and communicating with the customer. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. Thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
All  of  you  have  mentioned  NANC,  the  North  American  Num-
bering  Council.  It  was  set  up  to  advise  the  FCC  on  matters  that 
we  are  now  discussing.  I  gather  that  NANC  has  not  been  submit-
ting  any  important  recommendations  on  matters  that  we’re  dis-
cussing now. 

Mr.  Banks,  you  suggested  another  group,  made  up  of  consumers 
and  wireless  and  wireline  people.  Are  you  suggesting  we  wipe  out 
NANC? 

Mr. BANKS. No, I’m certainly not. I think NANC has been a lead-
er in this area, and in particular, they formulated a working group, 
a  subcommittee  composed  of  consumer  representatives,  and  car-
riers,  to  work  on  intermodal  porting.  And  they  submitted  a  pretty 
detailed  report  to  the  FCC  in  2004,  and  since  then  a  sub-group  at 
NANC  has  continued  to  work  on  solving  piece-parts  of  the  inter-
modal porting problems, and to make those better. 

So,  a  big  chunk  of  their  work  and  report  was  done  in  2004,  and 

they’ve continued working on this problem since then. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Are  you  suggesting  that  legislation  is  not  nec-

essary because NANC is operating? 

Mr.  BANKS.  No.  I  think  that  this  bill,  and  discussion—as  I  said 
before—are very good to motivate people to look more at this issue, 
and to go back to the FCC and NANC, and work more on it. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  was  interested  in  your  responses  to  Senator 
Stevens’ questions. I was impressed by The Wall Street Journal ar-
ticle  on  the  recent  mad  rush  to  push  this  iPhone,  Apple  iPhone, 
and  then  the  problem  that  followed  that.  Is  there  any  way  we  can 
resolve that? This congestion problem? 

Mr.  BANKS.  Well,  I  think  the  fact  that  whatever—500,000  of 
them  were  sold  over  the  course  of  a  weekend  is  probably  difficult 
for  any  industry  to  deal  with.  It  seemed  to  me  the  problems  were 
relatively  small,  and  I  think  it’s  very  difficult  to  know.  I  mean,  I 
would  assume  that  a  great  majority  of  the  issues  are  on  wireless- 
to-wireless  porting,  because  wireline-to-wireless  porting  is  about  3 
percent  of  total  ports.  So,  I’m  sure  there  are  some  issues  with 
wireline-to-wireless,  but  I’m  sure  there  were  many  issues  with 
wireless-to-wireless ports as well. 

The CHAIRMAN. I would like to ask the panel, do you believe that 
this  Committee  should  proceed  in  acting  upon  this  bill?  I’ll  ask 
each  one  of  you.  Do  you  think  we  should  continue?  Or  just  stop  it 
at this point? Mr. Schremp? 

Mr.  SCHREMP.  I  think  the  Committee  should  continue  on  two 
bases. One is relative to your earlier point about NANC. You know, 
from our perspective, in the wireline-to-wireline world, there are no 
market  forces  that  are  going  to  drive  efficiency.  It’s  a  documented 
fact that the incumbent providers are losing 6 to 7 percent market 
share  every  year.  And  other  alternatives,  both  wireless  and  com-
petitive wireline included, are picking up that market share. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

29 

So, regardless of cost allocations and those sorts of things, the in-
cumbent  telcos  are  in  a  net-loss  position  for  wireline  services,  pe-
riod.  And,  whether  it’s  through  FCC  action,  or  through  this  Com-
mittee, we believe that the market forces, again, are not sufficient, 
and  that  further  action  is  required.  Again,  either  through  FCC  ac-
tion or through this Committee, and legislation associated. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Banks? 
Mr.  BANKS.  Well,  I  think  again,  the  Committee’s  interest  in  this 
issue,  and  the  discussion  we’re  having  here,  can  only  help  the  en-
tire industry sit down and work through these issues. But they are 
very complicated, and some of them are very costly. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Clark? 
Mr. CLARK. Mr. Chairman, I’m always bound by Association pol-
icy  and  resolution  that’s  been  adopted,  and  I  have  to  say  that  we 
haven’t taken a specific position on this piece of legislation. 

However, from my own perspective, I think at the very minimum 
it  makes  sense  to  keep  the  legislation  alive,  to  keep  the  pressure 
up.  We  believe  that  the  FCC  can  address  this,  has  the  authority 
to  address  it,  but  to  the  extent  that  it  continues  to  not  be  acted 
upon,  we  believe  that  hearings  such  as  this,  and  potential  legisla-
tion are worthwhile. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Guttman-McCabe? 
Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  agree,  I  think, 
with  my  colleagues  on  the  panel  that,  at  the  least,  it  makes  sense 
for  the  Committee  to  continue  to  watch  over  what  is  happening  at 
the  Commission.  We  are  concerned  by  the  concept  of  leaving  this 
with  the  NANC  or  the  ATIS  Forum,  because  those  are  consensus- 
driven  bodies,  and  at  least  half  of  the  membership  of  those  con-
sensus-driven  bodies  don’t  have  the  incentive  to  reach  consensus. 
So,  there  is  an  active  proceeding  at  the  Commission,  it’s  alive,  it’s 
recent,  and  hopefully  the  Commission  will  act  appropriately  and 
timely  on  that.  If  not,  then  I  think  it,  you  know,  it  makes  sense 
to  revisit  the  fact,  or  the  need  for  legislation.  But,  in  the  interim, 
watching  over  the  process,  and  making  sure  that  something  hap-
pens, makes complete sense. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Stevens? 
Senator  STEVENS.  Was  there  an  increase  in  hoarding,  after  the 

FCC acted? 

Mr. GUTTMAN-MCCABE. In its original? 
Senator STEVENS. Yes. 
Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  Yes,  absolutely.  And,  initially,  in  the 
wireless-to-wireless  space,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  there  was  a  large 
number  of  ports,  that  I  think  has  toned  down  a  little  bit,  but  it’s 
been  relatively  consistent  in  the  wireless-to-wireless  space.  The 
wireline-to-wireless  space  we’re  seeing,  as  Mr.  Schremp  had  said, 
we’re seeing a quarter-to-quarter drop in the number of people who 
have  LEC  lines,  and  in  turn,  a  significant  percentage  of  those  are 
people who are trying, when they cut the cord, to bring their num-
bers with them, so—— 

Senator STEVENS. To the whole panel—what’s the single-greatest 
cost  involved  in  porting?  I  assume  it  differs  from  smaller  to  me-
dium  to  larger-sized  telephone  companies,  but  what’s  the  greatest 
cost  involved  in  this?  Is  it  manual?  Does  it  involve  sending  a  guy 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

30 

out  in  a  truck?  What  is  the  cost  here,  in  terms  of  that  shifting? 
Basic costs. 

Mr. CLARK. Mr. Chairman, I personally haven’t been through one 
of  the  LNP  cost-benefit  cases  in  my  own  State  of  North  Dakota— 
a  number  of  state  commissions  have,  and  I  think  that  we  could 
probably  provide  you  with  some  of  that  information  in  a  follow  up 
response form. 

I  think  what  you’ll  probably  find  is  it,  it  really  depends  on  the 
size  of  the  company,  and  when  you  talk  about  smaller  LECs,  they 
just simply don’t—at least up to this point—get a lot of porting re-
quests, and so the per-port cost would be quite high. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Let  me  be  the,  just  the  devil’s  advocate  here. 
Could  I  just  decide  I  want  to  keep  my  wireline,  and  I  want  to  add 
wireless to it? Can I have two providers on the same number? 

Mr. GUTTMAN-MCCABE. I don’t think that technology exists right 

now, Mr. Vice Chairman. I think that—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  So,  if  I  have  an  IP  phone,  by  definition—have 

to leave the wireline if I want to use it? 

Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  I  think  that  is  the  case,  with  the  tech-

nology today. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Is  it  coming?  Why  shouldn’t  I  be  able  to  say, 
by just a little switch on my phone at home, that’s wired, I’m going 
off on the wireless now, I want to use this as I ride my motorcycle. 
Mr.  CLARK.  Chairman  Stevens,  I  believe  that,  that  technology 
isn’t far from what is soon going to be rolled out by T-Mobile, a lot 
of  folks  have  keyed  in  on  that  where,  the  technology,  when  you’re 
out on your motorcycle rides over the wireless network, traditional 
cellular  network,  when  you  get  near  your  home,  it  actually  hits  a 
WiFi  spot,  and  at  the  point  that  it  picks  up  that  WiFi  signal,  the 
call  goes  over  a  traditional,  sort  of,  broadband-type  network.  And 
the  device  itself,  recognizes  when  it’s  close  to  one  of  those  spots, 
where it can hit the broadband network, versus—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  hope  someone  does—I  prefer  using  my 
speakerphone  at  home,  I  can  work,  and  turn  it  on.  I  can’t  do  that 
with  the  iPhone,  but  I  can’t  have  it  when  I’m  out,  away  from  the 
house. It does seem to me that some of this problem could go away 
if  we  just  say,  look,  you  can  use  another  mechanism  if  you  want 
to, you don’t have to switch services in order to do it. 

Senator Thune? 
Pardon me, Mr. Chairman, your—— 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I appreciate you 
holding  the  hearing.  I  think  that  it’s  pretty  clear  that  giving  cus-
tomers the ability to keep their telephone numbers as they change 
service  providers  is  one  of  the  smarter  things  that  the  Congress 
has  done  in  recent  years,  in  terms  of  telecommunications  policy, 
and I would argue that it’s been—by and large—a success. The bar-
riers to changing voice service providers have dropped significantly 
with  the  advent  of  number  portability,  and  that  means  more  com-
petition.  So,  I  think  we  can  expect  that  voice  service  providers 
won’t  simply  rely  on  their  customer’s  desire  to  keep  their  phone 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

31 

number  as  a  reason  to  keep  their  service  with  their  current  pro-
vider. 

I do have a couple of questions, with regard to making that proc-
ess  work  more  smoothly,  and  regarding  any  additional  action  that 
ought to be taken, either by Congress or the FCC. And the first has 
to  do  with  whether  or  not  the  witnesses  believe  that  the  FCC  cur-
rently has the authority to act on this issue. 

Mr. CLARK. Yes. 
Mr. GUTTMAN-MCCABE. Yes. 
Senator THUNE. Everybody is in agreement on that point? 
Then, can you tell us why Congress ought to be intervening, and 
is there anything that the legislation that’s before us does that the 
FCC couldn’t do on their own? 

Mr. CLARK. I think the rationale for Congress intervening would 
be  is,  if  the  sense  of  Congress  is  that  it  just  simply  is  taking  too 
long at the FCC to act on some of the petitions, and concerns, and 
questions  that  have  been  raised  about  the  length  of  time,  and  the 
differential,  really,  between  wireline-to-wireline  porting,  and 
wireline-to-wireless porting, Senator. 

Senator THUNE. Anybody else care to comment on that? 
Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  I  think  I  would  agree  with  that  state-
ment, that if Congress can provide a measure of oversight over the 
Commission process, and if it, if it extends too long, or an outcome 
comes out that doesn’t make sense, then Congressional action like-
ly  would  make  sense  in  that  case.  But,  the  most  recent  filing  by 
Sprint  and  T-Mobile  was  in  December,  and  that  docket  has  been 
fully submitted, and hopefully we’ll have a decision from the Com-
mission in the short-term on that. 

Mr.  SCHREMP.  And  from  Charter’s  perspective,  we’ve  overcome, 
you  know,  a  whole  host  of  hurdles  to  become  successful  in  the  fa-
cilities-based  wireline  market,  you  know,  including  certainly  inter- 
connection agreements, inter-connection rights, you know, economic 
issues about making facilities-based competition work. 

But,  given  that  three-quarters  of  our  customers  port  their  num-
bers  when  they  come  to  us,  we  have—on  a  daily  basis—what  we 
view  as,  you  know,  a  barrier  to  competition.  Certainly  for  those 
cases  where,  you  know,  where  we’ve  got  folks  that  aren’t  abiding 
by  the  current  4-day  rule.  So,  any  mechanism  to  enforce  that  cur-
rent 4-day rule is something that enables us to continue to be suc-
cessful,  and  to  drive  additional  investment  in  launching  new  mar-
kets. 

Senator  THUNE.  Are  we  seeing  any  differences  in  number  port-

ability between large and small voice service providers? 

Mr.  BANKS.  Yes,  I  mean,  from  the  USTelecom  perspective,  the 
difference  we  see  is  that  smaller  carriers  tend  to  be  more  manual 
in  how  they  deal  with  these  requests,  larger  carriers  tend  to  have 
more  complex  operating  systems  that  can  automate  some  of  the 
process.  But  there’s  very  clearly  a  difference  between  how  smaller 
carriers  can  afford  to  approach  this  problem,  how  larger  carriers 
can. 

Senator  THUNE.  And,  do  you  think  we  need  different  deadlines 

for portability, for, based on the size of the carrier? 

Mr.  CLARK.  Senator  Thune,  one  of  the  things  that  I  would  just 
comment  on,  is  probably  one  of  the  state  commissions  that  has  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

32 

very  well-developed  record  on  this  particular  topic  is  your  home 
state of South Dakota. I’m very familiar with a number of the folks 
down  there,  and  they  had  very  extensive  hearings  on  the  cost  to 
implement  local  number  portability,  specifically  for  those  carriers 
defined under the Act as rural. 

Senator  THUNE.  Anybody  else  care  to  comment  if  we  ought  to 

have some distinction between—? 

Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  Sure,  I  think,  I  think  if  a  distinction 
comes  out  of  the  process,  and  it’s  sort  of  a  fully  vetted  process  at 
the Commission, and it makes sense, that’s one thing. Our concern 
is that the process has completely stalled in front of the NANC and 
the  ATIS  Ordering  and  Billing  Forum,  and  it’s  been  in  this  same 
state  since  2004.  And,  as  I  said  earlier,  those  are  both  consensus- 
driven bodies, and when a significant portion of the membership of 
those bodies has no incentive to reach a consensus, it makes logical 
sense that the process is going to stall. 

What  we’ve  done  as  T-Mobile  and  Sprint,  and  then  as  an  indus-
try  association  is  put  a  recommendation  on  the  table,  saying  that 
this can be done with four fields, and can be done quickly, and we 
have  to  believe  that  if  a  carrier  only  has  to  monitor  less  fields,  in 
some areas, it has to cost less. It just seems, seems just eminently 
logical.  And,  our  ports  are  working—a  larger  number  of  ports, 
quicker time, less fields, with less failures. And I think that’s kind 
of  like  a  grand  slam  in  the  sense  that,  if  all  four  of  those  things 
are  true,  we  see  a  need  to  sort  of  export  that  into  the  wireline-to- 
wireless  port  space.  And,  hopefully,  that’s  where  the  Commission 
comes  out,  is  reducing  the  amount  of  time,  and  reducing  the 
amount  of  fields  that  are  needed  to  be  filled  in  before  a  port  be-
comes successful. 

Senator  THUNE.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  and  thank  our  panel 

for your testimony, and your answering questions. Thanks. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Based  upon  your  testimony,  and  your  suggestions,  and  I’ll  have 
to  confirm  with  the  Vice  Chairman,  I  wish  to  announce  that  this 
bill  will  be  subject  to  an  Executive  Session,  or  mark-up,  a  week 
from  today.  So,  may  I  suggest  that,  if  you  have  any  recommenda-
tions  as  to  amendments,  additions,  or  what  have  you,  will  you 
please advise us as soon as you can? 

With that, the hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:10 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:41 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75680.TXT JACKIE

